
Fonu2 Inc (FONU.PK)  People | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Fonu2 Inc (FONU.PK)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataTechnologyInternet Services












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				FONU.PK on OTC Markets Group


				0.00USD
--





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    --


					            (--)
					        






Prev Close

$0.00


Open

--




Day's High

--


Day's Low

--




Volume

--


Avg. Vol

3,105,602




52-wk High

$0.00


52-wk Low

$0.00











					Summary





Name
Age
Since
Current Position




							Joel Shapiro

44
2014

                                Chairman of the Board




							Roger Miguel

58
2015

                                President, Chief Executive Officer, Director




							Graham Bradstreet

62
2015

                                Chief Financial Officer




							Alice Neuhauser

54
2015

                                Chief Operating Officer




							Nicole Leigh-Van Coller

43
2015

                                Secretary




							Joseph Giamichael

43
2015

                                Director



» Insider Trading





					Biographies





Name
Description




							Joel Shapiro


					
							Mr. Joel Shapiro serves as Chairman of the company. Mr. Shapiro has served as a founder or co-founder of several technology and commercial product companies and has helped structure finance companies in Asia, South America, Australia, Western Europe, Eastern Europe, and North America. Shapiro is also a former Principal and Vice President from M.H. Meyerson & Company, where he served as a Senior Equities Trader, servicing clients such as Goldman Sachs, Lehman Brothers, and Deutsche Bank. Mr. Shapiro currently serves as the Company’s Chairman of the Board. Mr. Shapiro was formerly an officer of Medient Studios, Inc. (now Moon River Studios, Inc.)




							Roger Miguel


					
							Mr. Roger Miguel is President, Chief Executive Officer, Director of the Company. He was President, Chief Executive Officer, Interim Chief Financial Officer, Director of FONU2 Inc. Mr. Miguel graduated from The University of Toronto in 1979 with an Honors BA in Commerce and Economics and has over 30 years experience in the Information Technology Industry. He currently is serving as Chief Operating Officer at the Company’s newly-formed wholly-owned subsidiary, FONU2 CCN, Inc. which includes responsibility for all corporate and administrative functions, sales, marketing, contract negotiations and strategic partnerships. Previously Roger held Senior Management Positions with some of the worlds largest Computer Services Outsourcing Companies (EDS/HP, Computer Sciences Corp, Xerox Business Services). He managed application services outsourcing across wide variety of industries and provided large account management with major clients such as General Motors, Sears and the Government of Ontario, Canada. Served as Regional Applications Services Manager for CSC in the U.S. Midwest region, Application Service Center Director (900 FTEs) for South East US, and Services Director of Global Process Management for the Americas and the Zurich Financial Services global account. Successfully managed all aspects of the business including participating in several successful CMMI Level 3, ISO 9K, ISO 20K certifications, large program and product management, business process re-engineering, and business process outsourcing.




							Graham Bradstreet


					
							Mr. Graham Bradstreet is Chief Financial Officer of the company. Mr. Graham Bradstreet served as one of three founders of the Working Title Group of Companies in 1986. Working Title grew to become the UK's pre-eminent production company (Map of the Human Heart, A World Apart... ) Mr. Bradstreet developed innovative film financing structures that have established him as one of the leading motion picture financiers in the world. From 2000 through today, Mr. Bradstreet has worked as a consultant to various entities and was the executive producer for the movies Carmen and 360. From August 2012 through February 27, 2015, he worked as a financial consultant for Medient. From 1997 through 2001, he was the founder and director of ICE Media, which managed insurance-backed film financing. Mr. Bradstreet qualified as a chartered accountant in New Zealand in 1974. Mr. Bradstreet was formerly an officer of Medient Studios, Inc. (now Moon River Studios, Inc.)




							Alice Neuhauser


					
							Ms. Alice P. Neuhauser is Chief Operating Officer of the company. Ms Alice P. Neuhauser has a broad range of operational entertainment experience in financial management, establishment and oversight of corporate, legal and accounting procedures, and business development and strategic planning. Ms. Neuhauser's career includes financing some of the largest independently financed pictures including Terminator 2 (starring Arnold Schwarzenegger) and Cliffhanger (starring Sylvester Stallone. Ms. Neuhauser also managed two $100 million revolving film production credit facilities with two separate syndicates of banks, which helped finance such movies as Basic Instinct (starring Michael Douglas and Sharon Stone) and Total Recall (starring Arnold Schwarzenegger and Sharon Stone). Alice developed a $100 million motion picture and television production facility from concept through 100% utilization. This 22-1/2 acre studio lot includes 14 state-of-the-art sound states, eight production buildings, a commissary, a four-story office building, and a parking garage. Ms. Neuhauser received an MBA from the Anderson School at UCLA in 1994. She received her BA at Harvard College in 1984.




							Nicole Leigh-Van Coller


					
							Ms. Nicole Leigh-Van Coller is Secretary of Company. She was Secretary, Director of FONU2 Inc. She is a 1989 graduate of Washington High School in Phoenix, Arizona. For the past six years, she has been significantly involved in the Company’s operations, including web site design and maintenance, inventory and shipping, online sales fulfillment and general operations.




							Joseph Giamichael


					
							Mr. Joseph Giamichael is Director of Company. Mr. Giamichael will be the chairman of the audit committee. Mr. Giamichael was formerly a director of Medient Studios, Inc. (now Moon River Studios, Inc.). Other than his experience in serving as a director of Medient, there have been no transactions between Mr. Giamichael and any related party, nor any material plans, contracts, or arrangements to which Mr. Giamichael is a party. Mr. Giamichael is the founder and Chief Executive Officer of Umbrella Research and Advisory, an emerging growth research and advisory financial services boutique. He has extensive capital markets experience, including over a decade as a publishing analyst and several years as a trader with an emphasis on special situations, as well as having served as an advisor to a middle markets-oriented private equity firm. Mr. Giamichael earned his Bachelor of Science degree from Skidmore College and was previously employed by Global Hunter Securities LLC, Rodman and Renshaw LLC, CJS Securities LLC, and Knight Capital Group. Mr. Giamichael currently serves as the Company’s Chairman of the Audit Committee. There are no family relationships between Mr. Giamichael and any other director, executive officer or person nominated or chosen by the Company to become a director or executive officer. Mr. Giamichael was formerly an officer of Medient Studios, Inc. (now Moon River Studios, Inc.)











					Basic Compensation





Name
Fiscal Year Total




							Joel Shapiro

--




							Roger Miguel

2,017,000




							Graham Bradstreet

--




							Alice Neuhauser

--




							Nicole Leigh-Van Coller

796,100




							Joseph Giamichael

--



As Of 
29 Sep 2014





					Options Compensation





Name
Options
Value




							Joel Shapiro

0
0




							Roger Miguel

0
0




							Graham Bradstreet

0
0




							Alice Neuhauser

0
0




							Nicole Leigh-Van Coller

0
0




							Joseph Giamichael

0
0









					Insider Trading












Name
Shares Traded
Price


Miguel (Roger F)
7,125,000
$0.00




» Full list on Insider Trading
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataTechnologyInternet Services









































 



 FONU2 Inc. Announces Vice-President of Equipment Rental 
         










    










 






 











 









FONU2 Inc. Announces Vice-President of Equipment Rental

Jul 09, 2015, 09:26 ET
		  		  					
						 from   FONU2, Inc. 











 
















































 

 






















































 























 

 

 
 
 
 







Robert DuVall - Vice President Equipment Rentals    
									
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest


FONU2 Inc logo.    
									
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




Robert DuVall - Vice President Equipment Rentals
 























 




 




FONU2 Inc logo.
 


 
























 




 





 


RINCON, Ga., July 9, 2015 /PRNewswire/ - FONU2, Inc. (OTC QB: FONU) ("FONU2″) announced today that Robert DuVall has joined Moon River Studios as Vice President of Equipment Rental.
DuVall's career spans 25 years in the technical and sales side of the entertainment industry. DuVall was previously the owner of Savannah Grip & Electric and Director of Audio Visuals at the Savannah International Trade & Convention Center.  His expertise is in providing rental equipment, supplies, and crews, as well as consulting for live corporate events, commercials, music videos, television series, and feature films.
DuVall attended Savannah College of Art and Design for video and holds membership with I.A.T.S.E. Local 491 Studio Mechanics of the Carolinas and Savannah, GA.
"I've acquired many customers through Savannah Grip & Electric, and I continue to take on new clients referred by my existing client base in the film industry," says DuVall. "I look forward to funneling this existing stream of revenue to Moon River Studios, and I am excited to offer Savannah a professional rental facility with a strong customer focus."
About FONU2 Inc.FONU2 Inc. is a film studio and social commerce company that is actively developing a 1,560 acre film studio complex in Effingham County, Georgia. The studio operates under the name Moon River Studios, Inc., inspired by Savannah musician Johnny Mercer's song "Moon River" from Breakfast at Tiffany's. The facilities and the equipment will be available for rental to production companies as well as utilized by the Company for its own films.
Safe Harbor StatementThe Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a "safe harbor" for forward-looking statements. Certain information included in this press release contains statements that are forward-looking, such as statements related to the future anticipated direction of the industry, plans for future expansion, various business development activities, planned or required capital expenditures, future funding sources, anticipated sales growth, and potential contracts. Such forward-looking information involves important risks and uncertainties that could significantly affect anticipated results in the future and, accordingly, such results may differ from those expressed in any forward-looking statements made by, or on behalf of, the company. These risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, those relating to development and expansion activities, dependence on existing management, financing activities, domestic and global economic conditions, and other risks and uncertainties described in the Company's periodic filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150709/234441Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150707/232348LOGO
 
 SOURCE  FONU2, Inc.  

RELATED LINKS
http://fonu2.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  
















Jul 15, 2015, 08:22 ET
Preview: FONU2 Issues Film Studio Construction Update




















Jul 07, 2015, 10:16 ET
Preview: FONU2 Announces Filing of S-1 Registration Statement








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


  




nFüsz | The Attention Demanding Hollywood Tech Company – nFusz is reinventing the way a message is expressed, received, and responded-to… by providing interactive communication tools, limited only by the creator’s imagination.

















































 











Home
About Us
Products

notifiWEB
notifiLINKS
notifiADS
notifiCRM


Case Studies

ORU


Investors

SEC Filings
Stock Information
Press Releases


Contact Us
News


















Get in touch. Write us an e-mail or call us,
info@bbooth.com
855-250-2300
Facebook.
Instagram.

Let’s work together Arrange a meeting with us at our office, We'll be happy to work with you!

Wanna join our crazy team? We are always looking for new talents and we are expecting you.

 







Home
About Us
Products

notifiWEB
notifiLINKS
notifiADS
notifiCRM


Case Studies

ORU


Investors

SEC Filings
Stock Information
Press Releases


Contact Us
News
 




Search for:




Tags.app
business
crm
hollywood
juiceplus
money sense
multilevel marketing
nasdaq
network marketing
news
stock
Tech
  Recent Posts. 

Silicon Review Just Named nFüsz as One of The 50 Fastest Growing Companies of The Year 2017
June 14, 2017


Juice Plus’ Qualifying National Marketing Director calls notifi “A Complete Game Changer”
May 8, 2017


Developments Happening in the Diverse Entertainment Industry
April 25, 2017


bBooth Announces Completion of Corporate Name Change to nFusz, Inc.
April 24, 2017


This Disruptive CRM Company can Dominate its $37 Billion Industry
April 20, 2017


 




















Search site...





























 






 


 

 

 

 


 


 


 

 


 


 

WE DELIVER ATTENTION! 


 



























allows customers to create and display sales, product, or corporate videos with ‘clickable’ interactive links in the actual video on their ‘WordPress’ and other template-based websites, viewable on desktop and mobile devices.










allows our customers to embed their interactive videos in online ads they can place almost anywhere online, such as in Facebook ads, among other popular online destinations.










allows our customers to DISTRIBUTE interactive videos via Email, Text Messaging, Social Media, and Electronic Invitations, among many other distribution methods.










our Flagship Product is an enterprise-class, fully scalable platform. It is built around our core technology for the creation and delivery of interactive videos that serve as the centerpiece of our CRM and Lead Generation solution for any sales-based organization.





Read More…





Read More…





Read More…





Read More…









Trial Version | Coming Soon

CLIENTS AND PARTNERS








 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 

















               Either scripts and active content are not permitted to run or Adobe Flash Player version            11.1.0 or greater is not installed.    




 























FONU2 - 首頁 | Facebook














跳至Section of this PageAccessibility HelpPress alt + / to open this menuFacebook電子郵件或電話密碼忘記帳號？註冊首頁關於相片活動貼文社群建立粉絲專頁社群查看全部2,279 人說這讚2,230 個人正在追蹤關於查看全部FONU2.COM產品／服務用戶2,279 個讚更多大家都按讚的專頁The Libman Company產品／服務Citrix公司Infrax Systems, Inc.業務顧問中文(台灣) · English (US) · Español · Português (Brasil) · Français (France)隱私政策 · 使用條款 · 廣告 · Ad Choices · Cookie · 更多 Facebook © 2017相片顯示全部貼文FONU2 · 2016年8月2日 · More local press for Coup d'EtatStars Michael Caine, Katie Holmes in Savannah for new movieStars Michael Caine, Katie Holmes in Savannah for new movie查看更多：SAVANNAHNOW.COMFONU2 · 2016年8月1日 · Coup d'Etat Photo'sKatie Holmes Enjoys Time With Suri After 'Coup D'etat' Filming | katie holmes set filming coup etat savannah 01 - PhotoKatie Holmes Enjoys Time With Suri After 'Coup D'etat' Filming: Photo #3722259. Katie Holmes is leggy and fabulous while shooting her new movie Coup D'etat on Friday (July 31) in Savannah, Ga. The 37-year-old actress was joined in the scene…justjared.com顯示全部貼文FONU2 · 2016年8月1日 · Our current project...New movies ready to roll in Savannah starring Katie Holmes, Michael CaineKatie Holmes and Michael Caine are in Savannah filming a movie called "Coup D'Etat."wtoc.comFONU2 · 2016年5月16日 · In the news 2.....'Mara' Paralyzes Cannes Buyers With Fear - Bloody Disgusting!'Mara' Paralyzes Cannes Buyers With Fear - Bloody Disgusting!查看更多：BLOODY-DISGUSTING.COMFONU2 · 2016年5月16日 · In the news this week....First look: Olga Kurylenko in 'Mara'EXCLUSIVE: Supernatural horror wrapped this week in the US.screendaily.comFONU2 · 2016年3月31日 · Moon River Studios (OTC - FONU) begins pre-production on motion picture, Mara.Moon River Studios (FONU2) Announces Pre-Production for Mara - OTCMarkets.comView complete news release for Moon+River+Studios+%28FONU2%29+Announces+Pre-Production+for+Mara - OTCMarkets.comotcmarkets.comFONU2 · 2016年2月19日 · Here is a list of all the Moon River job openings in the greater Savannah, GA areaProduction Staff2102 Line Producer: Line Producer reports to the producer and manages the budget and physical production of the film. The person applying for this position must be experienced. Resume and reference…moonriverstudiosinc.comFONU2 · 2016年2月18日 · 美國 Florida 邁阿密 · Moon River to start hiring production staff for the motion picture "Mara"Moon River to start hiring for "Mara" productionMoon River Studios has announced it will hire approximately 60 people for production of the motion picture “Mara.”effinghamherald.netFONU2 · 2016年1月27日 · Moon River Studios appoints Jeff Maynard as Head of Post ProductionMoon River Appoints Head of Post ProductionRINCON, Ga., Jan. 27, 2016 /PRNewswire/ — FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) (“FONU2”, “Moon River” or “Company”) announced today that it has appointed Jeff Maynard…fonu2.comFONU2 · 2016年1月19日 · 美國 Florida 邁阿密 · Moon River Studio's announced that they have signed agreements to finance and produce the motion picture film, Mara.Moon River Announces Financing and Film ProductionRINCON, Ga., Jan. 19, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) (prnewswire.comFONU2 · 2015年11月19日 · 美國 Florida 邁阿密 · Moon River Studios Announces Mary Aloe as Head of Film Packaging and Daniel Grodnik as Head of Film Production for the StudioMoon River Studios Announces Head of Film Production and PackagingRINCON, Ga., Nov. 19, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) (prnewswire.comFONU2 · 2015年10月28日 · Moon River Studios Announces Worldwide Distribution Agreement for Yellow a Film Written and Directed by Nick Cassavetes, Starring Sienna Miller, Melanie Griffith, Heather WahlquistMoon River Studios Announces Worldwide Distribution Agreement for YellowRINCON, Ga., Oct. 28, 2015 /PRNewswire/-- FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) (prnewswire.comFONU2 · 2015年10月26日 · Effingham County IDA Approves Scaled Down Moon River Studios ProjectEffingham County IDA Approves Scaled Down Moon River Studios ProjectRINCON, Ga., Oct. 26, 2015 — FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) (“FONU2”, “Moon River” or “Company”) announced today that the Effingham County Industrial Authority …fonu2.comFONU2 · 2015年10月21日 · Moon River Studios latest project:  James Brown, The Last Show is a music film centered on the artist’s last performance.   Read more….James Brown: The Last ShowJames Brown: The Last Show查看更多：MOONRIVERSTUDIOSINC.COMFONU2 轉貼自 Moon River Studios · 2015年10月20日 · Georgia to become ‘filmmaking capital of the world’? | TheCitizen.comWill its epicenter be in Fayetteville?thecitizen.comFONU2 分享了 1 條連結。 · 2015年10月20日 · Moon River Studios to produce James Brown documentary - Atlanta Business ChronicleMoon River Studios may not have any sound stages built yet, but it is already taking on projects.bizjournals.comFONU2 · 2015年10月20日 · FONU2 and Moon River Studios in association with RKA Entertainment and Loochie Records & Publishingwill be producing a documentary on the legendary Godfather of SoulMoon River Studios Announces Production of James Brown DocumentaryMoon River Studios Announces Production of James Brown Documentary查看更多：FONU2.COM查看更多







Companies news



















Electronic components database




Search Circuit
SectionSupplierDatasheet
 Search
Log in















Companies news of 2015-07-15 (page 2)
GainClients, Inc. Announces Explosive 77% Growth in New Monthly Subscriptions over the...
FONU2 Issues Film Studio Construction Update
UrtheCast Closes Acquisition of Earth Observation Satellites and Business Operations from...
Product Launch! Neurosync - The World's Smallest Brain-Computer-Interface
CBIZ To Webcast 2015 Second-Quarter and First-Half Results Conference Call
Honeywell To Improve Operations For Liquefied Natural Gas Pipeline In ChinaTechnology from...
EMS Find Expands its Mobile On Demand Platform by Launching Development of RN Find
First-Ever Black Hat Survey Reveals Disturbing Spending Gap in Enterprise IT Security...
KEMET Announces Change In Time Of Day For The June 2015 Quarter Earnings Release
ShoreTel Provides the Lowest First- and Five-Year Costs for IP Telephony and UC...
Rentrak Cross-Platform Entertainment Rankings - July 15, 2015--Only Rentrak Precisely...
Customer Driven Innovation Highlighted in Latest Version of Upland's Professional Services...
Cheetah Mobile Partners with Cheetah Conservation Fund to Save the Wild CheetahJoint PSA...
New White Paper: How Next-Generation Power Modules Simplify Power DesignMaxim Integrated's...
iRobot Schedules Second-Quarter 2015 Earnings Call
Newsbyte: Latest Release of SAP(R) SQL Anywhere(R) Suite Brings Mission-Critical Services...
Tata Consultancy Services Wins Gold, Silver and Bronze Stevie(R) at 2015 American Business...
Furuno Selects Digi International for its Next-Generation Marine Navigation Systems
Validian Upgrades Cyber-Security Platform with First-To-Market Secure Advertising...
Elbit Systems Schedules Second Quarter 2015 Results Release for August 11, 2015Conference...
HTC Makes Premium Smartphones Affordable With New HTC Desire(R) LineupNew HTC Desire...
Allot Communications to Host Second Quarter 2015 Earnings Results Conference Call on...
StyleSeat Announces Closing of $25 Million in Series B Funding
DirectView Announces Plans to Connect Its Body-Worn Cameras and Security Products to...
Smith Micro Software Schedules Teleconference to Discuss Second Quarter 2015 Financial...
UniPixel Relocates Corporate Headquarters to Silicon Valley and opens Taiwan...
61% of Mobile Workers Trust Their Employer to Keep Personal Information Private on Their...
Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SA and Cassiopea S.p.A. Select DATATRAK Unified Platform for Global...
Trimble Establishes Four BuildingPoint Distribution Partners in Australia, New Zealand and...
Zebra Technologies to Sponsor, Present at Inaugural APPNATION IoT Influencers SummitIoT...



GainClients, Inc. Announces Explosive 77% Growth in New Monthly Subscriptions over the Past Five WeeksCompany Attributes Surge to Increased Expansion of Its Disruptive Technology - SikkU GCard
TUCSON, Ariz., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- GainClients, Inc.  ("GainClients"), developers and marketers of the revolutionary new SikkU GCard targeting the Real Estate Industry, announced today its number of new clients signing up for monthly subscriptions utilizing its SikkU GCard has surged from 1,363 to 2,411 representing a jump of 77%  from June 6, 2015 to July 11, 2015. In addition, the Company's total number of Partners increased almost 20% in the same time frame as well according to GainClients own scorecard tool. 
The surge in new customers for GainClients is attributed to the company's deeper market penetration in markets such as Seattle, Las Vegas and San Diego according to Ray Desmond, CEO and President of GainClients, Inc.
"Our SikkU GCard is rapidly gaining traction as demonstrated by our latest increase in new clients," says Desmond.  "Real Estate professionals and consumers alike are seeing the amazing benefits of our robust service firsthand as they utilize the SikkU GCard as part of their buy/sell process. We are confident we will continue to penetrate existing markets generating new monthly subscriptions while also expanding into other key markets, which we believe will be a boon for company revenues bringing us closer to profitability."
For Consumers, an account provides them the ability to save and view favorite properties, view recent Home Scoop(TM) (data service on any home) reports and a unique dashboard to track and review all home search activity via web and mobile.
For professional users, enhanced GCard sharing is a big plus. Users can now Share their GCard with one click, and no technical expertise. Users can also text, email, save and categorize new network contacts according to their type, i.e. other real estate professionals and/or consumer/clients.  Also, a newsletter service that professionals can send out to clients containing information about their home, homes for sale, neighborhoods and comps is a powerful tool that is now available.   
About GainClients, Inc.GainClients, Inc. trades on the OTC Market under the symbol GCLT. Its product, the SikkU GCard, is a relationship building and sales enhancement service for the real estate industry. GainClients generates revenue through monthly subscriptions from organizational, enterprise accounts, individual real estate, mortgage, and title and escrow professionals, along with real estate related organizations such as banks, credit unions, real estate and lender brokerages, and title/escrow and insurance companies. The service is available via the web, text and mobile applications. Learn more at https://gcard.sikku.com/Benefits or watch the GCard video on YouTube: http://youtu.be/ksX_0y02n3g
Contact:GainClients, Inc.1-800-920-1605investorrelations@sikku.com
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/gainclients-inc-announces-explosive-77-growth-in-new-monthly-subscriptions-over-the-past-five-weeks-300113765.html
GainClients, Inc.








FONU2 Issues Film Studio Construction Update
RINCON, Ga., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- FONU2, Inc. (OTCQB: FONU) ("FONU2") announced today that bid packages for the initial construction of the main entrance, the road to the first phase, and water lines from the water tower to the first phase have been completed, and have been distributed to local contractors.
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150707/232348LOGO
"We have had a number of local qualified contractors express their interest in bidding on this project," stated Steven Wohlfeil, Principal with Hussey Gay Bell, civil engineers for FONU2.  "We expect for bids to be received on July 21, 2015, and for the Company to award the contract in the first half of August 2015, pending issuance of required permits."
About FONU2 Inc.
FONU2 Inc. is a film studio and social commerce company that is actively developing a 1,560 acre film studio complex in Effingham County, Georgia. The studio operates under the name Moon River Studios, Inc., inspired by Savannah musician Johnny Mercer's song "Moon River" from Breakfast at Tiffany's. The facilities and the equipment will be available for rental to production companies as well as utilized by the Company for its own films.

Safe Harbor Statement
The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a "safe harbor" for forward-looking statements. Certain information included in this press release contains statements that are forward-looking, such as statements related to the future anticipated direction of the industry, plans for future expansion, various business development activities, planned or required capital expenditures, future funding sources, anticipated sales growth, and potential contracts. Such forward-looking information involves important risks and uncertainties that could significantly affect anticipated results in the future and, accordingly, such results may differ from those expressed in any forward-looking statements made by, or on behalf of, the company. These risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, those relating to development and expansion activities, dependence on existing management, financing activities, domestic and global economic conditions, and other risks and uncertainties described in the Company's periodic filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150707/232348LOGO 


 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/fonu2-issues-film-studio-construction-update-300113428.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150707/232348LOGO

FONU2, Inc.


CONTACT:  Media Contact Information, Lauren Sachs, Media Relations Manager,RUBENSTEIN PUBLIC RELATIONS, 1345 Avenue of the Americas, New York, NY10105, T: 212.843.8392 F: 212.843.9200, lsachs@rubensteinpr.com; or ContactInfo:  FONU2 Inc, Corporate Relations, CorporateRelations@fonu2.com 
Web site:  http://fonu2.com// 





UrtheCast Closes Acquisition of Earth Observation Satellites and Business Operations from Elecnor
UrtheCast adds two satellites, operations, and extensive imagery archive to its suite of Earth Observation sensors.
VANCOUVER, July 15, 2015 /CNW/ - UrtheCast Corp.  ("UrtheCast" or the "Company") today announced that its subsidiary has closed its previously-announced acquisition (the "Acquisition") of the Earth Observation business dba Deimos Imaging and DOT Imaging ("Deimos Imaging") from Elecnor, S.A. ("Elecnor") for an aggregate price of EUR76.4 million. Of that amount, EUR71.2 million was paid at closing, consisting of the agreed upon price of EUR69 million plus a working capital adjustment of EUR2.2 million, and an additional EUR5.2 million will be paid over the next five years. The all-cash transaction was financed with a combination of the net proceeds of an offering of 24,868,750 subscription receipts of the Company (the "Subscription Receipts") at CAD$4.00 per Subscription Receipt and cash on hand.
In addition to ownership and operation of the Deimos-1 and Deimos-2 satellites, UrtheCast has acquired satellite operations related to the collection, storage, processing, analysis, distribution, and licensing of imagery captured by these and other satellites. The combination of UrtheCast and Deimos operations is expected to significantly accelerate UrtheCast's strategies related to distribution, web platform development, and the building out of the UrtheCast Constellation.
In conjunction with the Acquisition, UrtheCast has entered into a Mutual Cooperation Agreement with Deimos Space, S.L.U ("Elecnor Deimos"). This agreement contemplates the participation of Elecnor Deimos as a strategic implementation partner for UrtheCast's planned 16-satellite constellation consisting of both optical and SAR instruments. Elecnor Deimos will join the other strategic partners expected to be involved in UrtheCast's constellation, which includes various Canadian companies expected to build elements of the SAR payload, as well as Surrey Satellite Technology Ltd. (UK) for the spacecraft platforms and optical payload.
"This is our first step off the Space Station, and an exciting growth opportunity that will help to accelerate our UrtheCast Constellation plans, while populating our platform with powerful content," explained Scott Larson, UrtheCast Co-founder and Chief Executive Officer. "By acquiring the entire satellite operations, two satellites and two ground stations, we've created another substantial revenue stream for the Company, and have improved our imagery archive with 6.5 billion square kilometers of Deimos Imaging data."
"We're delighted to welcome 50 additional employees from the Deimos Imaging team, a highly experienced group with deep roots in the Earth Observation industry," explained UrtheCast President and Chief Operating Officer, Wade Larson. "In combination with Deimos Imaging's robust customer base, our business development program is poised for further growth this year. Deimos Imaging has an established customer base in Europe and Latin America, including the European Space Agency, as well as commercial customers in the agricultural, forestry, and land use industries. "
Fabrizio Pirondini, Deimos Imaging Co-founder and Chief Executive Officer of Deimos Imaging, S.L.U., added: "These are exciting times for the Deimos Imaging team. By joining UrtheCast, our team is ready to contribute to the shared vision of disrupting the Earth Observation industry."
Concurrent with the closing of the Acquisition, each Subscription Receipt was deemed exchanged for one common share of UrtheCast (the "Common Shares"). The Common Shares will be issued to the holders thereof as soon as reasonably practicable in accordance with the terms of the Subscription Receipt Agreement dated July 7, 2015, a copy of which is filed under UrtheCast's SEDAR profile at www.sedar.com. The Subscription Receipts will be delisted from the Toronto Stock Exchange.
As a result of the upsize of the offering of Subscription Receipts on June 23, 2015, the Company was able to close the Acquisition without the need to draw on the previously announced commitment letter to provide a first priority secured term loan of EUR37.5 million. UrtheCast will from time to time determine what level of debt and related conditions, if any, are appropriate given the increased equity offering.
The Deimos-1 satellite
Launched: 2009
Estimated lifespan: 10 years
Imagery: 22m-resolution, 3-band imagery, with a 650-km swath
Collection rate: Data downloaded every 90 minutes, imagery collected 24/7
Collection capacity: 5,000,000+ square-kilometres per day
Facts:

--  High revisit rates over mid-latitude regions
--  Designed for monitoring agriculture and forestry
--  A member of the Disaster Monitoring Constellation
--  Large coverage allows for identifying problem areas in crops

The Deimos-2 satellite
Launched:  2014
Estimated lifespan: 7 years
Imagery: 75cm pan-sharpened images, with a swath of 12km
Collection capacity: 150,000+ square-kilometres per day
Facts:

--  Acquires imagery in either strip mode (images up to 1500 km long) or in
spot mode, shifting between targets
--  An agile platform, moving Â±45 off nadir
--  Wide-area acquisition mode can acquire 24-km wide strips up to 200 km
long in a single pass
--  Once problem areas are located using Deimos-1 imagery, Deimos-2's finer
resolution allows for more detailed analysis of the same region


About UrtheCast Corp.
UrtheCast Corp. is a Vancouver-based technology company that is developing the world's first Ultra HD video feed of Earth, streamed from space in full color. Working with prominent aerospace partners from across the globe, UrtheCast has built, launched, installed, and will soon operate its Ultra HD video camera, Iris, on the ISS alongside its Medium Resolution Camera ("MRC") which reached Initial Operation Capability ("IOC") in 2014. UrtheCast also owns and operates the Deimos-1 and Deimos-2 satellites through its Spanish subsidiary, operating as Deimos Imaging. Video and still image data captured by the cameras will be downlinked to ground stations across the planet and displayed on the UrtheCast web platform, or distributed directly to partners and customers. UrtheCast's cameras will provide Ultra HD video and still imagery of Earth that will allow for monitoring of the environment, humanitarian relief, social events, agricultural land, etc. Common shares of UrtheCast trade on the Toronto Stock Exchange as ticker 'UR'.
For more information visit UrtheCast's website at www.urthecast.com.
Forward Looking Information
This release contains certain information which, as presented, constitutes "forward-looking information" within the meaning of applicable Canadian securities laws. Forward-looking information involves statements that relate to future events and often addresses expected future business and financial performance, containing words such as "believe", "expect", and "intend", statements that an action or event "may", "might", "could", "should", or "will" be taken or occur, or other similar expressions and includes, but is not limited to the expected benefits of the Acquisition, the expected lifetimes of the Deimos-1 and Deimos-2 satellites, UrtheCast's expectations with respect to the operations of UrtheCast and Deimos Imaging, S.L.U. and DOT Imaging, S.L.U. (collectively, "DOT-Deimos") following closing of the Acquisition, commissioning of Iris, plans to operate camera components on, and stream video footage from, the ISS, proposed image and video product offerings, expectations regarding the growth of commercial operations, expected partners and customers to distribute such products and plans to develop, launch and operate UrtheCast's planned constellation of satellites with SAR and optical instruments (the "UrtheCast Constellation"). Forward-looking statements and information are subject to various known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond the ability of UrtheCast to control or predict, and which may cause UrtheCast's or DOT-Deimos' actual results, performance or achievements to be materially different from those expressed or implied thereby, including, but not limited to, UrtheCast not realizing the expected strategic benefits of the Acquisition, undisclosed liabilities of the acquired business of DOT-Deimos, risks related to integration of UrtheCast and the acquired business of DOT-Deimos, risks related to the potential for regulatory review and unwinding of the Acquisition, risks related to the provision of Elecnor or its affiliates of transition services following completion of the Acquisition or their termination of such services, UrtheCast's inability to access capital to finance the UrtheCast Constellation or other planned projects, the loss of any UrtheCast Constellation customers or strategic partners, delays caused by third parties in the development, building or launch of the UrtheCast Constellation, damage which may occur to the sensors, cameras or UrtheCast Constellation components during development, launch, installation or operation, delays in the Iris commissioning process, unexpected changes in Russian, Canadian or European government policies, as well as those factors discussed in the Company's annual information form dated March 20, 2015, (the "AIF") and the Company's prospectus supplement dated June 24, 2015 to its short form base shelf prospectus and amended and restated short form base shelf prospectus dated May 15, 2015, as each such shelf was amended on June 19, 2015 (together, the "Prospectus")  which are available under UrtheCast's SEDAR profile at www.sedar.com. Forward-looking information is developed based on assumptions about such risks, uncertainties and other factors set out herein, in the AIF and Prospectus, and as otherwise disclosed from time to time on UrtheCast's SEDAR profile. Forward-looking information is developed based on assumptions about such risks, uncertainties and other factors set out herein, in the AIF and Prospectus, and as otherwise disclosed from time to time on UrtheCast's SEDAR profile. UrtheCast undertakes no obligation to update forward-looking statements except as may be required by applicable Canadian securities laws. Readers are cautioned against attributing undue certainty to forward-looking statements.
UrtheCast Corp.


CONTACT:  Scott Larson, CEO and Co-founder, (778) 331-7823 Direct 
Web site:  www.urthecast.com/ 





Product Launch! Neurosync - The World's Smallest Brain-Computer-Interface
SAN DIEGO, July 15th, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Mind Solutions, Inc. , announces the launch of NeuroSync, the world's smallest Brain-Computer-Interface (BCI)! Pre-order sales to the general public have now been made available through the Company's website at www.MindSolutionsCorp.com, with the product expected for delivery at the end of this month. NeuroSync, which retails for $129 utilizes a single dry sensor that receives electrical signals produced by the brain to control actions on your smart phone or computer all through the power of your mind! NeuroSync is worn on the ear like a Bluetooth cellular device and receives electrical impulses through the ear canal. The device is extremely small and mobile, making it the most consumer friendly BCI on the market.
NeuroSync is sold with attractive packaging and bundled with tutorial software to begin using immediately. There are approximately 100 Apps currently on the market, which can be purchased through third party developers that are compatible with NeuroSync. The device allows for up to two actions to occur on the computer or smart phone by concentrating (Beta) or relaxing (Alpha). The applications for BCI technology are limitless and can range from video games played with the power of your mind to assistive learning devices for the disabled. Mind Solutions plans to begin developing new Apps compatible with NeuroSync following the launch of the device.
Sales through Amazon.com will commence following delivery of the final product to the distributor. The Company has also engaged a top tier marketing firm to generate online sales and is in the process of completing a 30 second commercial to be used on television and social media platforms. It is the Company's goal to make NeuroSync the best selling BCI device on the market and build shareholder value. 
Investor Relations - Casey Burt 888-461-3932  investor@MindSolutionsCorp.com  www.MindSolutionsCorp.com
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/product-launch-neurosync---the-worlds-smallest-brain-computer-interface-300113433.html
Mind Solutions, Inc.


Web site:  https://mindsolutionscorp.com/ 





CBIZ To Webcast 2015 Second-Quarter and First-Half Results Conference Call
CLEVELAND, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- CBIZ, Inc.  has scheduled a conference call for Wednesday, July 29, 2015, at 11:00 a.m. (ET) to discuss the Company's financial results for the second-quarter and first-half periods ended June 30, 2015.  CBIZ will release its financial results before the market opens the morning of July 29, 2015.  At that time, a copy of the release will be available on the Company's web site at www.cbiz.com.
The call will be webcast in a listen-only mode over the Internet for the media and the public.  A link to the webcast can be obtained at www.cbiz.com the morning of the call.  
The call will be hosted by CBIZ Chairman and CEO Steve Gerard, President and COO Jerry Grisko and CFO Ware Grove.  During the call, management will review the Company's financial results for the 2015 second quarter and first half, comment on the Company's outlook for remainder of the year, and respond to questions from current shareholders and analysts.   
Shareholders and analysts who would like to participate in the call can pre-register using this link: http://dpregister.com/10069503 in order to receive the dial-in number and unique pin number. Participants may register at any time, including up to and after the call start time.  
A replay of the webcast will be made available approximately two hours following the call on the Company's web site at www.cbiz.com. For those without internet access, a replay of the call will also be available starting at approximately 1:00 p.m. (ET) July 29, 2015 through 5:00 p.m. (ET), July 30, 2015. The toll free dial-in number for the replay is 1-877-344-7529.  If you are listening from outside the United States, dial 1-412-317-0088.  The access code for the replay is 10069503.
Named one of America's 2015 Best Employers and ranked as the #1 employer in the consulting and accounting industry by Forbes magazine, CBIZ, Inc. provides professional business services that help clients better manage their finances and employees.  CBIZ provides its clients with financial services including accounting, tax, financial advisory, government health care consulting, risk advisory, real estate consulting, and valuation services.  Employee services include employee benefits consulting, property and casualty insurance, retirement plan consulting, payroll, life insurance, HR consulting, and executive recruitment.  As one of the nation's largest brokers of employee benefits and property and casualty insurance, and one of the largest accounting and valuation companies in the United States, the Company's services are provided through more than 100 Company offices in 33 states. 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cbiz-to-webcast-2015-second-quarter-and-first-half-results-conference-call-300113290.html
CBIZ, Inc.


CONTACT:  Lori Novickis, Director, Corporate Relations, CBIZ, Inc.,Cleveland, Ohio, (216) 447-9000 
Web site:  http://www.cbiz.com/ 





Honeywell To Improve Operations For Liquefied Natural Gas Pipeline In ChinaTechnology from Honeywell Process Solutions Helping Meet Energy Demand in Guangxi
BEIJING, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Honeywell  Process Solutions (HPS) today announced that its technology will help improve operations for China's long-distance Guangxi liquefied natural gas (LNG) high-pressure pipeline.
A key strategic project of Sinopec Limited and Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region, the Guangxi LNG pipeline will play a critical role in optimizing China's energy structure and meeting the demand for natural gas in Guangxi. The project will use HPS gas measurement and equipment and software to measure the flow and pressure in the pipeline.
"We are able to draw upon our experience in long-distance, natural gas high-pressure pipelines to provide expertise to this essential clean energy project," said Aldous Wong, HPS vice president, Greater China. "Pipelines have challenges that are very different from processing plants since you have to manage an operation that is hundreds or sometimes thousands of miles long. Measurements such as flow and pressure must be accurate and immediately accessible to keep the pipeline operating most efficiently."
The pipeline should be completed later this year, and will have a capacity of 8 billion cubic meters of LNG a year and a total length of more than 1,300 miles, from Maoming to Beihai in the Guangxi region. This pipeline will be part of a network that transports natural gas and LNG from as far away as Kazakhstan to China. HPS technology is already being used on all three of the 1,100-mile Central Asia to China pipelines as well as the 5,600-mile West to East II pipeline across China.
The integrated gas measurement technologies provided by Honeywell includes computer software and sensors that measure flow, temperature, pressure and other indicators that are critical to maintain optimum performance throughout the entire long-distance pipeline. These include:

--  Ultrasonic Flowmeters, which measure natural gas for custody transfer
applications, which require high reliability, excellent metering
certainty and repeatability.
--  Flow Computers, which can perform parallel calculations of
compressibility according to all established methods, including GERG 88
S, AGA 8 and AGA NX 19.
--  SmartLine((R)) Temperature and Pressure transmitters, which are the
industry's first modular and most reliable transmitter, which deliver
value across the entire plant lifecycle. These transmitters reduce
initial purchasing costs, provide flexibility for post start-up
modifications, and reduce maintenance and inventory costs while
providing high accuracy and stability.

Honeywell Process Solutions (www.honeywellprocess.com) is a pioneer in automation control, instrumentation and services for the oil and gas; refining; pulp and paper; industrial power generation; chemicals and petrochemicals; biofuels; life sciences; and metals, minerals and mining industries. Process Solutions is part of Honeywell's Performance Materials and Technologies strategic business group, which also includes UOP, a leading international supplier and licensor of process technology, catalysts, adsorbents, equipment, and consulting services to the petroleum refining, petrochemical, and gas processing industries.
Honeywell (www.honeywell.com) is a Fortune 100 diversified technology and manufacturing leader, serving customers worldwide with aerospace products and services; control technologies for buildings, homes, and industry; turbochargers; and  performance materials.  For more news and information on Honeywell, please visit www.honeywellnow.com.
This release contains certain statements that may be deemed "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. All statements, other than statements of historical fact, that address activities, events or developments that we or our management intends, expects, projects, believes or anticipates will or may occur in the future are forward-looking statements. Such statements are based upon certain assumptions and assessments made by our management in light of their experience and their perception of historical trends, current economic and industry conditions, expected future developments and other factors they believe to be appropriate. The forward-looking statements included in this release are also subject to a number of material risks and uncertainties, including but not limited to economic, competitive, governmental, and technological factors affecting our operations, markets, products, services and prices. Such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance, and actual results, developments and business decisions may differ from those envisaged by such forward-looking statements. We identify the principal risks and uncertainties that affect our performance in our Form 10-K and other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/honeywell-to-improve-operations-for-liquefied-natural-gas-pipeline-in-china-300111668.html
Honeywell


CONTACT:  Don Empie, +1 832 252 3619, donald.empie@honeywell.com 
Web site:  http://www.honeywell.com/ 





EMS Find Expands its Mobile On Demand Platform by Launching Development of RN Find
PHILADELPHIA, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- EMS Find, Inc. (OTCQB: EMSF), the developer of innovative health care solutions, today announced its intention to expand the EMS Find Application by commencing development of the RN Find, on-demand mobile platform, designed to connect hospitals, nursing homes, home care agencies and other health care providers with nursing professionals who are actively seeking additional employment and assist patients looking for help with post-acute and sub-acute health care.
In the Age of Affordable Care Act, a massive migration of registered nurses is taking place - from traditional clinical settings to case management where nurses are expected to take on much larger role much more like that of primary physicians. Today, on demand mobile apps have become a strategic imperative for health care organizations to effectively compete in this new mobile era," said Steve Rubakh, CEO of EMS Find, Inc. "By bundling and jointly marketing the EMS Find and the RN Find, we are targeting what is projected to be a 119 billion dollar annual labor sector by year 2022 with 3.5 million nurses working at major hospitals, nursing homes and home care agencies. Our company is focused on creating a unique and innovative B2B and B2C real time platform designed to facilitate the highest level of health care."
According to a newly published report by the Georgetown University Center, the economy will create 1.6 million job openings for nurses through 2020 but still, there won't be enough nurses to fill those openings, thus a shortage of 193,000 nursing professionals is projected.
The report's major findings support an increasing demand for nurses due to:

--  crowded nursing schools continue to reject 1 out of 3 qualified
applicants
--  expansion of health care insurance coverage to millions of Americans
--  increase in legal barriers to immigrate nursing talent
--  retirement of old nurses, resulting in creation of thousands of job
openings
--  1.6 million job openings are projected with 700,000 of those resulting
from newly created positions and 880,000 resulting from retirements

About: EMS Find, Inc. develops and markets B2B & B2C on-demand mobile platform, designed to connect health care providers and consumers to a network of medical transport companies throughout the United States and Canada. The company's solution facilitates, speeds up and connects health care providers and the public with ambulance providers for the benefit of the patients. The platform enables users (hospitals, medical offices, dialysis centers, nursing homes, home care agencies and other medical providers) and the public to schedule medical transportation in a timely and efficient way based on the type of medical transportation which best fits each patient's needs. The EMS Find app will work on any smart device including smart phones, tablets or laptops. iOS, android and desktop versions will allow users to connect in real time to local and nearby pre-screened medical transportation companies wherever the medical transports are needed and fit the medical, logistical and financial criteria.
Safe Harbor Statement
The information posted in this release may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. You can identify these statements by use of the words "may," "will," "should," "plans," "explores," "expects," "anticipates," "continue," "estimate," "project," "intend," and similar expressions. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those projected or anticipated. These risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, general economic and business conditions, effects of continued geopolitical unrest and regional conflicts, competition, changes in technology and methods of marketing, and various other factors beyond the Company's control.

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/ems-find-expands-its-mobile-on-demand-platform-by-launching-development-of-rn-find-300113564.html
EMS Find, Inc.


CONTACT:  Steve Rubakh, emsfactory@aol.com, (215) 677-0200 





First-Ever Black Hat Survey Reveals Disturbing Spending Gap in Enterprise IT Security ResourcesOnly 27% of Security Workforce Feel Their Organization is Equipped to Defend Against Current Threats
SAN FRANCISCO, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Today, Black Hat, the world's leading family of information security events releases its first-ever research report ahead of the annual conference this August. Based on a survey of nearly 500 top-level security experts who have attended the annual Black Hat USA conference, this research highlights the trends and pitfalls of the InfoSec world with responses from one of the most security-savvy audiences in the industry. The 2015 Black Hat Attendee Survey reveals a significant gap between the priorities and concerns as well as the actual expenditure of security resources in the average enterprise. For more information and to download the full report, 2015: Time to Rethink Enterprise IT Security, visit: blackhat.com/latestintel/07152015-attendee-survey.html.
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150714/236815LOGO
In 2015, enterprises will spend more than $71.1 billion on information security - more than they have ever spent before, according to Gartner Group figures. Yet, the incidence of major data breaches shows no signs of abating. As enterprises continue to struggle with online attacks and data leaks, many are asking one common question: What are we doing wrong?
The 2015 Black Hat Attendee Survey revealed that most en terprises are not spending their time, bud get, and staffing resources on the problems that most security professionals consider to be the greatest threats.
A Troubling Disparity between Priorities and Actual Resources
The survey revealed a significant gap between the top concerns that keep security professionals awake at night, compared to the tasks that keep them occupied during the day. For example:

--  Sophisticated Targeted Attacks: 57% of respondents indicated attacks
targeted directly at their organization as their greatest concern.
However, only 26% indicated that mitigating these attacks were among the
top three security spending priorities in their organization. Further,
only 20% said targeted attacks were among the top three tasks they spend
the most time on day-to-day.
--  Social Engineering: At 46%, the second greatest concern was phishing,
social network exploits or other forms of social engineering. Yet, only
22% indicated their organization spends a large portion of their
security budget here. And only 31% indicated that they spend a large
amount of their time on social engineering.

If not on their top concerns for the business, where are security professionals spending their time?

--  More than a third of Black Hat attendees said that their most
time-consuming tasks are in addressing vulnerabilities introduced by
internally developed software (35%) and vulnerabilities introduced by
off-the-shelf software (33%). The data suggest that application flaws
across the enterprise consume a great deal of time for the IT staff, yet
are seldom considered the greatest threats.

Warning to the Industry: Serious Shortage of IT Security Resources and Staffing 
Nearly three quarters (73%) of respondents think it is likely that their organizations will have to deal with a major data breach in the year ahead. A key reason for security professionals' con cerns about future attacks is the shortage of resources that they feel in their own orga nizations:

--  Staffing Shortage: Only 27% of respondents said they feel their
organization has enough staff to de fend itself against current threats.
--  Measly Budgets: Only one-third (34%) said their organization has enough
budget to defend itself against cur rent threats.
--  In Need of Training: While 36% said they have the skills they need to do
their jobs, some 55% said they could use some training.

The combina tion of these responses should serve as a warning to the industry that security defense strategies and resources need serious re thinking, and that the protectors of the enterprise are not confident in their ability to keep adversaries out of systems and data.
Download the Full Research Report 
The survey results indicate a pressing and immediate need to re think the current enterprise IT security model. Top concerns are changing - and the structure of resources, staffing and budget should follow suit. For actionable insights and a glimpse into the top concerns in the years to come, download a copy of 2015: Time to Rethink Enterprise IT Security by visiting: blackhat.com/latestintel/07152015-attendee-survey.html.
Black Hat USA 2015: August 1-6 in Las Vegas
Just weeks after the survey results present these troubling industry trends, the InfoSec community will gather to discuss, collaborate and share solutions for many of these developments at the annual Black Hat USA show, returning to Las Vegas for its 18(th) year. The week will kick off with nearly 70 separate deeply technical Trainings, followed by more than 110 innovative research-based Briefings. Covering everything from vulnerabilities within critical infrastructure to exploits against the most popular operating systems, mobile devices and automakers, Black Hat USA 2015 will present one of the most comprehensive programs in the event's history. For more information and to save $400 on your Briefings Pass by July 24, please visit blackhat.com/us-15/.
About Black Hat
For more than 17 years, Black Hat has provided attendees with the very latest in information security research, development, and trends. These high-profile global events and trainings are driven by the needs of the security community, striving to bring together the best minds in the industry. Black Hat inspires professionals at all career levels, encouraging growth and collaboration among academia, world-class researchers, and leaders in the public and private sectors. Black Hat Briefings and Trainings are held annually in the United States, Europe and Asia, and are produced by UBM Tech. More information is available at: http://www.blackhat.com.
About UBM Tech
UBM Tech engages technology professionals live and online through its world-class brands, including Black Hat, InformationWeek, Enterprise Connect, Game Developers Conference (GDC), Dark Reading, HDI, GTEC, Network Computing and Interop. We're dedicated to fostering real engagement by creating environments where the technology industry can make connections, share insights, and network effectively. UBM Tech is the only media company that delivers large-scale industry events, leading online brands and content marketing services serving the Enterprise IT, Information Security, Game Development, Enterprise Communications and Technical Services and Support communities. UBM Tech is a part of UBM (UBM.L), a global provider of media and information services with a market capitalization of more than $2.5 billion. For more information, go to http://tech.ubm.com.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236815LOGO

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/first-ever-black-hat-survey-reveals-disturbing-spending-gap-in-enterprise-it-security-resources-300113485.html


Photo:  https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236815LOGO

UBM Tech


CONTACT:  Meredith Corley, Black Hat Public Relations, BlackHatPR@ubm.com 
Web site:  http://www.tech.ubm.com/ 
Company News On-Call:  http://www.prnewswire.com/comp/AAB329.html





KEMET Announces Change In Time Of Day For The June 2015 Quarter Earnings Release
GREENVILLE, S.C., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- KEMET Corporation  previously announced it will host a conference call at 10:30 AM (EDT) on Tuesday, July 28, 2015, to discuss its financial results for the first quarter ended June 30, 2015.  The time has been changed to start at 9:00 AM (EDT).  The call will last approximately one hour.
To access the call via telephone, participants in the United States should dial 1-800-416-8033, and participants outside the United States should dial 1-706-643-0979.  Participants should reference "KEMET Corporation" and Conference ID #81317444.  Participants can view a corresponding presentation from the KEMET website at www.kemet.com by clicking on the first quarter conference call link in the Investor Relations section of the website.  The presentation will be available immediately prior to the beginning of the call.  Following management's comments, there will be an opportunity for questions.
In conjunction with the conference call, there will be a simultaneous live broadcast over the internet that can be accessed at http://ir.kemet.com/.  A replay of the conference call will be available until midnight, August 11, 2015, through the same link.  
About KEMET
KEMET Corporation is a leading global supplier of electronic components. We offer our customers the broadest selection of capacitor technologies in the industry across all dielectrics, along with an expanding range of electromechanical devices, electromagnetic compatibility solutions and supercapacitors. Our vision is to be the preferred supplier of electronic component solutions demanding the highest standards of quality, delivery and service. KEMET's common stock is listed on the NYSE under the symbol "KEM." Additional information about KEMET can be found at www.kemet.com.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT ON FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Certain statements included herein contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of federal securities laws about KEMET Corporation's (the "Company") financial condition and results of operations that are based on management's current expectations, estimates and projections about the markets, in which the Company operates, as well as management's beliefs and assumptions. Words such as "expects," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," variations of such words and other similar expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions, which are difficult to predict. Therefore, actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in, or implied by, such forward-looking statements. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which reflect management's judgment only as of the date hereof. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any of these forward-looking statements to reflect new information, future events or otherwise.
Factors that may cause actual outcome and results to differ materially from those expressed in, or implied by, these forward-looking statements include, but are not necessarily limited to the following:
(i) adverse economic conditions could impact our ability to realize operating plans if the demand for our products declines, and such conditions could adversely affect our liquidity and ability to continue to operate; (ii) continued net losses could impact our ability to realize current operating plans and could materially adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to continue to operate; (iii) adverse economic conditions could cause the write down of long-lived assets or goodwill; (iv) an increase in the cost or a decrease in the availability of our principal or single-sourced purchased raw materials; (v) changes in the competitive environment; (vi uncertainty of the timing of customer product qualifications in heavily regulated industries; (vii) economic, political, or regulatory changes in the countries in which we operate; (viii) difficulties, delays or unexpected costs in completing the restructuring plan; (ix) equity method investments expose us to a variety of risks; (x) acquisitions and other strategic transactions expose us to a variety of risks; (xi)  the inability to attract, train and retain effective employees and management; (xii) the inability to develop innovative products to maintain customer relationships and offset potential price erosion in older products; (xiii) exposure to claims alleging product defects; (xiv) the impact of laws and regulations that apply to our business, including those relating to environmental matters; (xv) the impact of international laws relating to trade, export controls and foreign corrupt practices; (xvi) volatility of financial and credit markets affecting our access to capital; (xvii) the need to reduce the total costs of our products to remain competitive; (xviii) potential limitation on the use of net operating losses to offset possible future taxable income; (xix) restrictions in our debt agreements that limit our flexibility in operating our business; and (xx) additional exercise of the warrant by K Equity, LLC which could potentially result in the existence of a significant stockholder who could seek to influence our corporate decisions.
Contact: William M. Lowe, Jr. Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer williamlowe@KEMET.com  864-963-6484 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/kemet-announces-change-in-time-of-day-for-the-june-2015-quarter-earnings-release-300113446.html
KEMET Corporation


Web site:  http://www.kemet.com/ 





ShoreTel Provides the Lowest First- and Five-Year Costs for IP Telephony and UC Deployments, According to Nemertes ResearchResearch shows ShoreTel also lowest in operational costs for both, the most important of the metrics according to Nemertes
SUNNYVALE, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- ShoreTel(R) , the leading provider of brilliantly simple phone systems and unified communications (UC) solutions, delivers the lowest first-year and five-year costs against eight competitors in a study by Nemertes Research for IP telephony and on-premises Unified Communications. In addition, ShoreTel has the lowest operational costs for both and the lowest implementation costs for on-premises UC, according to the study. 
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20131118/MM19469LOGO
Nemertes conducted a study of 264 organizations to gather real-world cost data for seven leading IP telephony and Unified Communications vendors. The companies interviewed and surveyed represented a range of industries and sizes, primarily in North America. 
The annual IP Telephony and UC study found that organizations are spending less year-over-year on their on-premises deployments, driven by extreme competition among vendors who are offering previously unseen prices for capital and licensing. Additionally, the study found that organizations are increasingly moving to or evaluating the cloud for some or all of their operations.
ShoreTel's first-year costs for IP Telephony across all size rollouts are $566 compared to a median of $717 across all vendors. ShoreTel also maintains the lowest first-year operational costs for all size rollouts, as well as the lowest five-year TCO for 200, 1,500 and 10,000 endpoints. For on-premises UC deployments, ShoreTel has the lowest operational and implementation costs.
"What's important to highlight is that this research is based on what companies are actually spending on their solutions. Operational costs are the most important of all, and organizations using ShoreTel spend significantly less to operate their systems than those who use other providers," said Robin Gareiss, president of Nemertes Research. "Based on the data, ShoreTel customers spend less initially and over time on their solutions. The IP Telephony and UC environments are changing rapidly and we recommend IT leaders negotiate hard, run cost models for five years out, and pay particular attention to implementation and operations costs."
To read the full Nemertes white paper, please visit here. ShoreTel is also hosting a webinar with Robin Gareiss on Tues., Aug. 4 at noon ET - register here.
About ShoreTel
ShoreTel, Inc.  is a leading provider of brilliantly simple IP phone systems and unified communications solutions powering today's always-on workforce. Its flexible communications solutions for on-premises, cloud and hybrid environments eliminate complexity, reduce costs and improve productivity. Recognized for its industry-leading customer experience and support, ShoreTel's innovative business phones, application integration, collaboration tools, mobility, and contact center applications enable users to communicate and collaborate no matter the time, place or device, with minimal demand on IT resources. ShoreTel is headquartered in Sunnyvale, Calif., and has regional offices and partners worldwide. For more information, visit www.shoretel.com.
ShoreTel and the ShoreTel logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of ShoreTel, Inc. in the United States and/or other countries. All other trademarks, trade names and service marks herein are the property of their respective owners.
Media contact: Katie Maller408-962-2786 kmaller@shoretel.com
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131118/MM19469LOGO 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/shoretel-provides-the-lowest-first--and-five-year-costs-for-ip-telephony-and-uc-deployments-according-to-nemertes-research-300113486.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131118/MM19469LOGO

ShoreTel


Web site:  http://www.shoretel.com/ 





Rentrak Cross-Platform Entertainment Rankings - July 15, 2015--Only Rentrak Precisely Measures Movies & TV Everywhere--
PORTLAND, Ore., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Rentrak , the leader in precisely measuring movies and TV everywhere, today announced the top weekly cross-platform entertainment rankings for July 15, 2015.
Universal's adorable and profitable "Minions" took over the Earth this weekend topping the worldwide box office chart with $239.5 million in 57 total territories for a whopping $395.7 million to date.  
In North American box office action, Universal's "Minions" may be small in stature, but leave a massive box office footprint with the second biggest animated debut of all time with $115.7 million. Great marketing, a perfect release date and multiple high profile product tie-ins made this a guaranteed hit and perhaps one of the most perfectly realized movie spin-offs ever.
On this week's Movies on Demand chart, Warner Bros.' R-rated prison comedy "Get Hard" starring Will Ferrell and Kevin Hart leads the charge (and is also number one on our DVD and Blu-ray Disc sales chart), followed by Sean Penn in Universal's action drama "The Gunman" and Liam Neeson in Warner Bros.' action thriller "Run All Night."
On our digital purchases and rentals chart, 20th Century Fox's, "Kingsman: The Secret Service," now in its seventh week of release enjoys its view from the top while sitting at the number one position. Fox's animated family-friendly comedy "Home" about a lovable misfit from another planet debuted strong on the charts in its first week of release by landing in the number two spot. Fox's comedy "Unfinished Business" starring Vince Vaughn continues to bring in business in its fifth week of release moving up the charts to the third position.
At the top of our DVD and Blu-ray Disc sales chart in its first week of release is Warner Bros.' "Get Hard" starring Will Ferrell and Kevin Hart. Meanwhile, Fox's action favorite "Kingsman: The Secret Service" drops to second place in its fourth week in release and is followed by the debut of Lionsgate's action adventure "Last Knights" starring Morgan Freeman and Clive Owen. This week on the DVD and Blu-ray Disc sales side of the ledger, Warner Bros.' caper crime comedy "Focus" starring Will Smith and Margot Robbie continues to be an audience favorite in its fifth week in release on the small screen followed by "American Sniper" and "Jupiter Ascending."
Telemundo's "El Senor de los Cielos" remains perched atop our viewer engagement for broadcast telecasts chart, followed by Telemundo's "Caso cerrado - Edicion especial" and Univision's "Que te perdone Dios... yo no."
Our top viewer engagement for cable telecasts chart has a newcomer in the top spot with Hallmark's "A Country Wedding" leading the way this week with BET's "BET Awards 2015" taking second followed by VH1's ever-popular "Love and Hip Hop Atlanta."
Finally, on our combined social media and digital engagement chart for viewers of broadcast and cable telecasts, Arielle Baril, an 11-year-old opera singer, led the way for NBC's "America's Got Talent" with a video generating 1.5M+ views on YouTube. Next up is ESPN's SportsCenter, which posted a throwback Instagram picture from the 1992 NBA Draft that garnered 122k+ interactions. Comedy Central's "Key & Peele" shared a Comedy Central post on gay marriage legalization earning a strong 31k+ interactions from sharing this post.
Click the links below to view the most recent charts:
Worldwide Box Office Domestic Box OfficeDVD & Blu-ray Disc SalesDVD & Blu-ray Disc RentalsMovies on DemandDigital Movies Sales & RentalsTV & Social Media Engagement
About Rentrak Corporation Rentrak  is the entertainment and marketing industries' premier provider of worldwide consumer viewership information, precisely measuring actual viewing behavior of movies and TV everywhere. Using our proprietary intelligence and technology, combined with advanced demographics, only Rentrak is the census currency for VOD and movies. Rentrak provides the stable and robust audience measurement services that movie, television and advertising professionals across the globe have come to rely on to better deliver their business goals and more precisely target advertising across numerous platforms including box office, multiscreen television and home video. For more information on Rentrak, please visit Rentrak.com.
RENTM
Contacts: Paul DergarabedianSenior Media AnalystOffice: 818.917.9697Email: pauld@rentrak.com 
Antoine IbrahimPR SpecialistOffice: 646.722.1561Email: aibrahim@rentrak.com
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20130114/LA42144LOGO
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20130114/LA42144LOGO 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/rentrak-cross-platform-entertainment-rankings--july-15-2015-300113513.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20130114/LA42144LOGO

Rentrak


Web site:  http://www.rentrak.com/ 





Customer Driven Innovation Highlighted in Latest Version of Upland's Professional Services Automation Application (PSA)Upland's Tenrox features new project status reporting module and simplified recurring billing processes
AUSTIN, Texas, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Upland Software, Inc. , a leader in cloud-based Enterprise Work Management applications, today announced that the latest version of its Tenrox professional services automation (PSA) and time and expense tracking application is now available. This latest edition was fueled by customer driven innovation, which includes two new modules - Project Status Reporting and Product Central - to extend the already robust and comprehensive capabilities of Upland's Tenrox.
"The latest enhancements to Upland's Tenrox PSA application provide our customers with even greater flexibility and productivity," said Kevin Sequeira, Upland Software's general manager and director of product management for the Tenrox line of business. "This product release was centered on a customer driven innovation model that subsequently resulted in the strengthening of our customer engagement and application delivery processes."
Tenrox's new and enhanced capabilities include:
Project Status Reporting (PSR) Module: The new PSR module allows project and portfolio manages to easily track the status of their projects through configurable forms and key performance indicators (KPIs). Updates are time stamped and powerful analytics let users see how projects are trending in order to make more informed decisions.
Product Central Module: The new Product Central Module creates easy billing of recurring entries, allowing finance and billing teams to quickly invoice and recognize revenue. The ability to define billing rules and forecast the quantity of items to bill ensures there is no revenue leakage due to unbilled entries.
Analytics: The addition of a new visualization layer allows users to create visually appealing reports, and the addition of new views allows a more comprehensive dataset on which reports can be built.
The Financial Planner: Enhancements include a new forecast rate engine and additional configurable options on the user interface.
Integrations: Updated partner integrations include SAGE ERP 300 2014, Microsoft Dynamics GP 2015, Microsoft CRM Online 2015 and Microsoft Project 2013.
For more information on the latest version of Tenrox, attend the highlights webinar on July 20, 2015 or go to tenrox.com/en/solutions/Tenrox2015-R1.htm. Tenrox is available directly from Upland, and in Australasia and neighboring territories through UXC Eclipse.
About Upland SoftwareUpland  is a leading provider of cloud-based Enterprise Work Management software. Our family of applications connects people through technology, automates the flow of work and brings visibility to all aspects of the organization. With more than 1,600 customers around the globe, and over 225,000 users, Upland helps teams in IT, marketing, finance, professional services and process excellence run their operations smoothly, adapt to change quickly and achieve better results every day. To learn more, visit www.uplandsoftware.com.
About TenroxThe Tenrox workflow-driven, cloud application is designed to meet the challenges of managing globally dispersed services organizations and project workforces. It automates project initiation, resource management, time and expense, and reporting and analytics to enable customers to improve the management of billable projects from pipeline to close. Tenrox offers configurable cost and billing rules, including chargeback or invoicing, with certified integrations to all major CRM and accounting systems. Organizations worldwide, including Abbot Vascular, Autodesk, Estee Lauder, Eaton, General Electric and JDA Software, trust the Tenrox product to meet their requirements in the areas of Professional Services Automation (PSA) and time and expense tracking. Tenrox is part of the Upland Software family of cloud-based enterprise work management applications. For more information, visit www.tenrox.com.
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20141106/156956LOGO
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20141106/156956LOGO 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/customer-driven-innovation-highlighted-in-latest-version-of-uplands-professional-services-automation-application-psa-300113156.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20141106/156956LOGO

Upland Software, Inc.


CONTACT:  Media - Karoline McLaughlin, media@uplandsoftware.com,512.960.1010 
Web site:  http://www.uplandsoftware.com/ 





Cheetah Mobile Partners with Cheetah Conservation Fund to Save the Wild CheetahJoint PSA campaign launches with video billboard in New York City's Times Square
SAN FRANCISCO, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Cheetah Mobile , the leading developer of mission-critical mobile utility applications, today announced a partnership with Cheetah Conservation Fund (CCF), the longest running cheetah conservation program in existence, to drive awareness for Africa's most endangered big cat.
As the first step, Cheetah Mobile and CCF are debuting a 10-second video PSA in New York City's historic Times Square Plaza running from the middle of July through the end of September. The video billboard is located at 1500 Broadway, exposing it to a potential audience of 1,500,000 people who pass by daily. The goal is to drive awareness for the plight of the wild cheetah, whose worldwide population has dropped from 100,000 one hundred years ago to only approximately 10,000 today. 
"In our experience, most people are not aware the cheetah is in danger of becoming extinct - but the reality is we are in a race against the clock. Unless people come together quickly to take action, there will soon not be enough cheetahs left to save," said Dr. Laurie Marker, founder and executive director of Cheetah Conservation Fund. "This urgency inspired us to take out a video billboard in Times Square, the crossroads of the world, to encourage more people to join the fight. We are very excited to partner with Cheetah Mobile to reach a wider audience with this critical call to action."
Going beyond the technology sector, Cheetah Mobile wants to leave a lasting impact on the world and help protect this iconic species from which it draws its inspiration and name. Cheetah Mobile is joining the fight to save Chip, its mascot, and the rest of his wild cheetah friends.
"We chose the name Cheetah Mobile because we want to be the fastest-running mobile Internet company in the world while helping our users have the fastest possible mobile experiences," said Cheetah Mobile CEO Sheng Fu. "I deeply admire the work that Cheetah Conservation Fund and Dr. Laurie Marker are doing to save the cheetah. It's an honor for Cheetah Mobile to join with them in protecting our namesake species."
Cheetah Mobile and CCF are encouraging their fans, users and supporters to interact with the campaign by sharing information about the endangered big cat through social media. The partners also suggest people passing through Times Square take a selfie with the cheetah billboard (when it runs once an hour), tag it with #SaveTheCheetah and share it on their personal networks. 
You can visit CCF's website, Cheetah.org/SaveTheCheetah, to find more information about the cheetah and the organization's programs designed to ensure long-term survival of the species. 
About Cheetah Mobile Inc. 
Cheetah Mobile is a leading mobile Internet company with approximately 443.6 million mobile monthly active users as of March 2015. Its mission critical applications, including Clean Master, CM Security, Battery Doctor and Photo Grid, help make the Internet and mobile experience speedier, simpler, and safer for users worldwide. Cheetah Mobile is the publisher of Clean Master, the #1 app in the Google Play Tools category worldwide by monthly downloads as of March 2015, according to App Annie.  
The Company also provides various platform products such as Duba.com, Cheetah browser, game centers, and mobile app stores to provide multiple user traffic entry points and global content distribution channels for its business partners.About Cheetah Conservation FundFounded in 1990 in Namibia, Cheetah Conservation Fund (CCF) is the global leader in research and conservation of cheetahs. CCF's award-winning, science-based programs are credited with stabilizing and increasing the wild cheetah population in Namibia, "The Cheetah Capital of the World," and serve as models for other cheetah conservation initiatives. CCF strives to develop best practices in research, education and land use to benefit all species, including people; activities include conducting international research, conservation, education, and job training programs to ensure the survival of the cheetah and its ecosystems for future generations. CCF is a registered non-for-profit organization in Namibia, Canada, UK and the U.S., where it has earned a "Four-Star Charity" rating by Charity Navigator, which recognizes sound fiscal management, commitment to accountability and transparency. 
People can learn more about CCF or make a donation by visiting www.cheetah.org.
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cheetah-mobile-partners-with-cheetah-conservation-fund-to-save-the-wild-cheetah-300113299.html
Cheetah Mobile; Cheetah Conservation Fund


CONTACT:  Cheetah Mobile, Josh Ong, press@cmcm.com, (626)322-7241; CheetahConservation Fund, Susan Yannetti, susan@cheetah.org, (202)716-7756 
Web site:  http://www.cheetah.org/ 





New White Paper: How Next-Generation Power Modules Simplify Power DesignMaxim Integrated's DC-DC power modules enable smaller, more efficient solutions to provide pin compatibility, a cost reduction path, and faster time to market.
SAN JOSE, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- A new white paper from Maxim Integrated Products, Inc.  examines how a new generation of flexible, easy-to-use power modules simplifies power design. Ready-made power modules enable system designers to shorten time to market and solve space constraints on their printed circuit board (PCB).
Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236488
The white paper, "Next Generation Power Modules Further Simplify Power Design," explains how these highly efficient power modules integrate all the key components needed for a smaller system-in-package (SiP) power solution. Using Maxim's new DC-DC power modules, customers can now combine the passive compensation components needed with the voltage regulator for a single, small, power-supply solution in an IC package.

--  Register for the white paper to learn about the benefits of smaller,
simpler, and more flexible power modules:
http://bit.ly/Maxim_power-modules_WP
--  For a list of Maxim's new power modules, visit:
http://bit.ly/Maxim_power-modules
--  For more information, visit: http://bit.ly/Maxim_power-modules_details

About Maxim Integrated
Maxim is the leader in analog integration. From mobile to industrial solutions, we're making analog smaller, smarter, and more energy efficient. Learn more at http://www.maximintegrated.com.

Contact:                   Ferda Millan
(408) 601-5429
Ferda.Millan@maximintegrated.com


To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/new-white-paper-how-next-generation-power-modules-simplify-power-design-300113195.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236488

Maxim Integrated Products, Inc.


Web site:  http://www.maximintegrated.com/ 





iRobot Schedules Second-Quarter 2015 Earnings Call
BEDFORD, Mass., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- iRobot Corp. , a leader in delivering robotic technology-based solutions, announced today it will issue its second-quarter 2015 financial results after market close on July 21.  
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20131104/NE10106LOGO
iRobot will host a live webcast and conference call, open to all interested investors, to review second-quarter 2015 financial results and outlook for 2015 financial performance on Wednesday, July 22. 
The earnings press release and prepared remarks document will be accessible on the investor section of the company's website at http://investor.irobot.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=193096&p=irol-EventDetails&EventId=5168627. 
Pertinent details include:

Date:           Wednesday, July 22
Time:           8:30 a.m. ET
Call-In Number: 847-619-6396
Passcode:                          38036260

A live, audio broadcast of the conference call also will be available at http://investor.irobot.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=193096&p=irol-EventDetails&EventId=5168627.  An archived version of the broadcast will be available on the same website shortly after the conclusion of the live event. A replay of the telephone conference call will be available through July 29, and can be accessed by dialing 630-652-3042, passcode 38036260#.
About iRobot Corp.iRobot designs and builds robots that empower people to do more. The company's home robots help people find smarter ways to clean, its defense & security robots protect those in harm's way, and its remote presence robots enable virtual presence from anywhere in the world. iRobot's consumer and military robots feature proprietary technologies incorporating advanced concepts in navigation, mobility, manipulation and artificial intelligence. For more information about iRobot, please visit www.irobot.com.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131104/NE10106LOGO 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/irobot-schedules-second-quarter-2015-earnings-call-300110384.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131104/NE10106LOGO

iRobot Corp.


CONTACT:  Elise Caffrey, Investor Relations, iRobot Corp., (781) 430-3003,ecaffrey@irobot.com; Matthew Lloyd, Media Relations, iRobot Corp., (781)430-3720, mlloyd@irobot.com 
Web site:  http://www.irobot.com/ 





Newsbyte: Latest Release of SAP(R) SQL Anywhere(R) Suite Brings Mission-Critical Services to the Internet of Things and Cloud
WALLDORF, Germany, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- SAP SE  today announced the release of version 17 of the SAP(R) SQL Anywhere(R) suite, a leading enterprise-ready, embeddable database technology with more than 12 million installations. Now Internet of Things (IoT) systems and data-intensive mobile apps can leverage the new remote data synchronization capabilities of SAP SQL Anywhere with the SAP HANA(R) platform to help securely move data between the enterprise and remote locations at the edge of the network.
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20110126/AQ34470LOGO
"With the latest release of SAP SQL Anywhere, enterprise data can be securely captured, accessed and fed back into SAP HANA from remote workplaces such as retail stores, restaurants and satellite offices within large enterprises," said Ken Tsai, vice president of Platform Technology, Platform Solutions Group, SAP. "Customers can also collect and analyze IoT data required for performing critical tasks at distant locations with low bandwidth or intermittent connections or even while offline. The SAP HANA platform continues to spur innovation for customers by embracing the pervasiveness of information at the network edge to help reduce operational costs and improve worker productivity."
The release of SAP SQL Anywhere version 17 benefits customers in three key areas:

--  Performance on a wide variety of IoT platforms: The new version can
automatically detect changes to the deployment environment and provide
optimal performance whether the server is running on a smart meter or
vending machine. New database administrator (DBA) cockpit and
application profiling tools provide enhanced monitoring and diagnostic
capabilities to help support new IoT application scenarios. To
facilitate a faster and easier development process, the new release also
supports a wide variety of modern programming languages and
environments, including support for Javascript stored procedures and
functions.
--  Smart, secure synchronization with cloud and on-premise systems: With
improved encryption and data isolation, customers can help protect their
data while at rest on edge devices and during synchronization to the
data center, whether on premise or in the cloud. Synchronization from
edge devices and IoT applications to SAP enterprise systems is
significantly improved with tighter integration with the SAP HANA
platform and expanded support for newer versions of the most popular
databases.
--  Always-on, always available operation: The down-time for SAP SQL
Anywhere database maintenance and application upgrades is significantly
reduced with new features, including online rebuild, dynamic starting
and stopping of connection protocols, and point-in-time recovery.

To download the latest version of SAP SQL Anywhere, visit the SAP Store. For more information, visit the SAP News Center. Follow SAP on Twitter at @sapnews.
Media Contact:
Scott Malinowski, +1 (617) 538-6297, scott.malinowski@sap.com, ET
Any statements contained in this document that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements as defined in the U.S. Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "expect," "forecast," "intend," "may," "plan," "project," "predict," "should" and "will" and similar expressions as they relate to SAP are intended to identify such forward-looking statements. SAP undertakes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements. All forward-looking statements are subject to various risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from expectations. The factors that could affect SAP's future financial results are discussed more fully in SAP's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"), including SAP's most recent Annual Report on Form 20-F filed with the SEC. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of their dates.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20110126/AQ34470LOGO

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/newsbyte-latest-release-of-sap-sql-anywhere-suite-brings-mission-critical-services-to-the-internet-of-things-and-cloud-300113202.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20110126/AQ34470LOGO

SAP SE


Web site:  http://www.sap.com/ 





Tata Consultancy Services Wins Gold, Silver and Bronze Stevie(R) at 2015 American Business AwardsTCS Honored for HR Executive of the Year, CSR Program of the Year and HR Department and Team of the Year
NEW YORK and MUMBAI, India, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Tata Consultancy Services (TCS),  a leading global IT services, consulting and business solutions organization, today announced it won four Stevie(R) Awards at the 13(th) Annual American Business Awards, the nation's premier business awards program. TCS was recognized with a Gold Stevie(R) for HR Executive of the Year, two Silver Stevie(R) Awards for CSR Program and HR Department of the Year, and a Bronze Stevie(R) for HR Team of the Year.
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20131002/LA90934LOGO-b
The American Business Awards, nicknamed the 'Stevies' for the Greek word 'crowned,' were presented to winners during a gala banquet in late June at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park Hotel to an audience of more than 400 nominees.  
"Winning four Stevies(R) at the American Business Awards speaks volumes regarding TCS' deep commitment to engaging its employees and helping to foster the next generation of IT talent in North America," said Surya Kant, President, North America, UK and Europe, TCS. "The leadership of our HR department and the broader team continue to raise the bar, creating innovative new programs to develop and retain our rapidly growing North American employee base, and we are also extremely proud of our CSR campaigns that continue to address the region's STEM skills gap by supporting underprivileged and minority students."
More than 3,300 nominations from organizations of all sizes and industries were submitted this year. More than 200 global executives participated in the judging process to select this year's Stevie Award winners.
"We are extremely impressed with the quality of the entries this year. The competition was intense and every organization that won should be proud," said Michael Gallagher, president and founder of the Stevie Awards. "To those outstanding individuals and organizations that received Gold, Silver and Bronze awards, the judges and I are honored to celebrate your many accomplishments and high standards for professionals nationwide."
The key contributors to TCS' three Stevie(R) Awards for human resources were its record hiring and recruitment processes specific to college and MBA graduates and experienced professionals. TCS was also recognized for its HR leadership and commitment to developing a world class organization through its workforce management practices and in depth training programs that aide employees in their development and growth at the company. Moreover, S. Narasimhan, Head of HR for North America, was recognized as HR Executive of the Year for his overall strategic approach to building a highly mobile and diverse workforce. 
TCS' North American CSR department received a Silver Stevie(R) Award for CSR Program of the Year, given its ongoing progress in fostering STEM education through its signature community engagement program, goIT. TCS' program provides students with in-school technology awareness and hands-on technical workshops, along with teacher training and parent orientations aimed at increasing student interest in IT careers. TCS was also recognized for its national partnerships with STEMconnector, US2020 and Million Women Mentors, along with its vast volunteering network, which in 2015 alone, saw more than 11,100 employees participate in 417 CSR events across the U.S. and Canada.
The four Stevie(R) Awards come on the back of TCS' recent 'Employee Engagement Award' in the Rewards and Recognition category at the North American Employee Engagement Awards Conference in New York City. TCS received the award for its commitment to improving employee engagement practices, by leveraging its GEMS rewards and recognition program, and its internal social networking platform, Knome. 
For more information on TCS's commitment to its employees and corporate responsibility, please visit here.
Details about The American Business Awards and the lists of Stevie winners are available at www.StevieAwards.com/ABA.    
About The Stevie Awards Stevie Awards are conferred in six programs: the Asia-Pacific Stevie Awards, the German Stevie Awards, The American Business Awards, The International Business Awards, the Stevie Awards for Women in Business, and the Stevie Awards for Sales & Customer Service. Stevie Awards competitions receive more than 10,000 entries each year from organizations in more than 60 nations. Honoring organizations of all types and sizes and the people behind them, the Stevies recognize outstanding performances in the workplace worldwide. Learn more about the Stevie Awards at http://www.StevieAwards.com.
About Tata Consultancy Services Ltd. (TCS) Tata Consultancy Services is an IT services, consulting and business solutions organization that delivers real results to global business, ensuring a level of certainty no other firm can match. TCS offers a consulting-led, integrated portfolio of IT, BPS, infrastructure, engineering and assurance services. This is delivered through its unique Global Network Delivery Model(TM), recognized as the benchmark of excellence in software development. A part of the Tata group, India's largest industrial conglomerate, TCS has over 324,000 of the world's best-trained consultants in 46 countries. The company generated consolidated revenues of US $15.5 billion for year ended March 31, 2015 and is listed on the National Stock Exchange and Bombay Stock Exchange in India. For more information, visit us at www.tcs.com.
Follow TCS on Twitter.  To stay up-to-date on TCS news in North America, follow @TCS_NA. Subscribe to an RSS Feed of TCS Press Releases.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131002/LA90934LOGO-b 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/tata-consultancy-services-wins-gold-silver-and-bronze-stevie-at-2015-american-business-awards-300113388.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20131002/LA90934LOGO-b

Tata Consultancy Services


CONTACT:  TCS media contacts: Global: Email: pradipta.bagchi@tcs.com,Phone: +91 22 6778 9999, Europe / UK: Email: abhinav.kumar@tcs.com |ashish.babu@tcs.com, Phone: +32 2282 1927 | +44 078 418 92227, India:Email: h.ramachandra@tcs.com | shamala.p@tcs.com, Phone: +91 22 6778 9078 |+91 22 6778 9081, USA / Canada: Email: b.trounson@tcs.com, Phone: +1 646313 4594, Asia Pacific: Email: sean.davidson@tcs.com, Phone: +65 9139 3668,Australia and New Zealand: Email: alex.goldrick@tcs.com, Phone: +61 (2)8456 2800, Latin America: Email: irais.moyat@tcs.com, Phone: +5255 91578282 
Web site:  http://www.tcs.com/ 





Furuno Selects Digi International for its Next-Generation Marine Navigation Systems
-- NavNet TZtouch2 Product Line Taps Into Digi ConnectCoreÂ® 6 Processing Power to Deliver Industry-Leading Navigation Performance
MINNETONKA, Minnesota, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Digi InternationalÂ® , the M2M solutions expert, today announced that Furuno Electric Co. Ltd [http://www.furuno.com/en/]. , a leading provider of marine communications and navigation equipment, has selected Digi's components and design services for its recently announced NavNet TZtouch2 advanced marine navigation systems.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150519/217082LOGO [http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150519/217082LOGO] 
With models for recreational, fishing and commercial boats, the NavNet TZtouch2 features a customizable touchscreen display, built-in dual-frequency Fish Finder, wireless hotspot connectivity, internal GPS antenna and more - all powering a 12.1-inch WXGA or 15.6-inch FWXGA display. The NavNet TZtouch2 systems - which were unveiled in February at the Miami International Boat Show - will use the Android operating system and integrate with a companion smartphone application to deliver new levels of simplicity and usability.
Specifically, Furuno will make use of Digi's ConnectCoreÂ® 6, the world's first surface-mount multi-chip module with built-in wireless connectivity. The ConnectCore 6 module's small form factor requires no connectors, is suitable for harsh marine environments, reduces manufacturing costs and makes it easy to build mobile/portable devices based on the Freescale i.MX6 application processor.
"The sophistication of Digi technology and the talents of their services team have been keys to our development of the NavNet TZtouch2 products," said Muneyuki Koike, Furuno managing director. "We can tap into a high level of processing power to ensure our new systems have the performance our customers have come to expect from Furuno. Additionally, Digi's track record gives us greater assurance about long-term availability and support of components." 
"Digi's worldwide support capabilities align very well with Furuno's global requirements. Our unique experience in supporting regional certifications was a key determinant in the selection process," said Kevin C. Riley, senior vice president of global sales. "We're delighted to have been selected by Furuno to help bring its next-generation family of products to market."
About Furuno Electric Co., Ltd. 
Furuno Electric Co., Ltd [http://www.furuno.com/en/]. develops and sells marine and industrial electronics products and systems, including radar, GPS, fish finders, sonar, satellite communication systems, radio equipment, and other deep-sea products. It also offers industrial electronics products, such as car navigation systems, electronic toll-collection system, and ETC automotive devices. The company was founded in 1938 and is headquartered in Nishinomiya, Japan.
About Digi International Digi International  is your mission-critical M2M solutions expert, providing the industry's broadest range of wireless products, a cloud-computing platform tailored for devices, and development services to help customers get to market faster with wireless devices and applications. Digi's entire solution set is tailored to allow any device to communicate with any application, anywhere in the world. For more information, visit Digi's website at www.digi.com [http://www.digi.com/], or call 877-912-3444 (U.S.) or 952-912-3444 (International).
Media Contact: Rick McLaughlin Davies Murphy Group, Inc. +1-781-418-2402 rmclaughlin@daviesmurphy.com [mailto:rmclaughlin@daviesmurphy.com]


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150519/217082LOGO

Digi International


Web site:  http://www.digi.com/ 





Validian Upgrades Cyber-Security Platform with First-To-Market Secure Advertising ChannelNew secure channel maintains integrity of ads by preventing the hijacking of content and/or links
OTTAWA, Ontario, Jul. 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ --Validian Corporation. (OTCQB: VLDI), a leading innovator in cyber-security technology, is pleased to announce the upgrade of its Core Technology Platform Version 3.1 (CTP 3.1) to include the first ever ultra-secure Advertising Channel.   This secure channel prevents hijacking of content or links, which maintains the integrity of ads to deliver reliable and higher value to ad content providers, ad-space hosts, those who are paying for ads, and people who are viewing them. 
Validian's ultra-secure Advertising Channel is designed to support:
1.     Third-party advertisements, for which there are more than 50 content providers in the world today including Google, Yahoo and Bing; 
2.     Service Bulletins or Announcements; and
3.     Advertisements, Bulletins and Announcements within applications on mobile and non-mobile devices
Validian's Advertising Channel is delivered via an innovative policy management platform that enables administrative control on the fly over the desired level of protection to suit different and fluctuating security needs.   
"The provision of advertising to end users of mobile devices and web applications is one of the largest sources of revenue to the mobile industry sector. However, existing technology that delivers advertising to browsers, mobile applications and mobile devices has significant security gaps that expose end users to application hijacking and to theft and improper access of their private digital information," commented Bruce Benn, Chief Executive Officer of Validian Corporation. "Validian's secure Advertising Channel is the first technology that prevents this and supports the growing industry demand for cyber security solutions that can protect their customers and end-users from these types of cyber threats."
CTP Version 3.1 enables secure digital communications on mobile devices using Android Mobile Operating Systems Versions 4.0.3 and later versions as well on non-mobile devices and servers using  Microsoft Windows Operating Systems (Windows 8 and 8.1, Windows 7, Vista and XP) and the Windows Server OS (2008 and 2003). CTP Version 3.1 is also cross platform ready enabling rapid completion of migration for mobile communications on mobile devices using either Apple, Microsoft and/or Blackberry mobile operating systems.
Validian CTP 3.1 will be installed as an upgrade at existing channel partners during Q3 2015 and also will be installed with new channel partners and customers beginning in Q3 2015.
About Validian Corporation
Validian Corporation (OTCQB VLDI) is a leading innovator in cyber security technology that provides secure access, retrieval, transfer, receipt and storage of digital information on mobile and non-mobile devices, servers, data bases and memory both at rest and in transit using wired, wireless and mobile networks.  Validian technology enables the next generation of secure Mobile Messaging and Communications, Cloud Computing, Cloud Storage, Distributed Computing and Web Application and WebPortal Access and Usage for desktop & laptop computers, servers, tablets and SmartPhones.
The Company provides solutions that can be customized to the client's business process to ensure end-to-end authenticity, integrity and custody of high value digital assets.   Validian is a U.S. public company with offices in the U.S. and Canada. Visit www.Validian.com for more information on its digital asset solutions.
Discuss Validian events here: http://investorshangout.com/Validian-Corporation-VLDI-68278/  
Safe Harbor Statement
Investors should carefully consider the information contained in this news release before making an investment in the shares of the company. Information contained in this news release contains "forward looking statements", which can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as "believes," expects," "may," "should," or "anticipates" or negative thereof or given that the future results covered by such forward -looking statements will be achieved. The preceding matters constitute cautionary statements identifying important factors with respect to such forward-looking statements, including certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to vary materially from the future statements. Other factors could also cause actual results to vary materially from the future results covered in such forward-looking statements.
Company:Bruce Benn, CEO and Presidentbbenn@validian.com +1-613-224-3535
Investor Relations:Howard Gostfrandinfo@amcapventures.com +1-305-918-7000
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/validian-upgrades-cyber-security-platform-with-first-to-market-secure-advertising-channel-300113552.html
Validian Corp


Web site:  http://www.Validian.com/ 





Elbit Systems Schedules Second Quarter 2015 Results Release for August 11, 2015Conference Call Scheduled for August 11, 2015 at 9:00am ET
HAIFA, Israel, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ --
 
    Elbit Systems Ltd.  announced today that it will be releasing its second quarter 2015 financial results on Tuesday, August 11, 2015.  
    The Company will also be hosting a conference call later the same day, Tuesday, August 11, 2015 at 9:00am Eastern Time. On the call, management will review and discuss the results and will be available to answer questions.  
    To participate, please call one of the teleconferencing numbers that follow. If you are unable to connect using the toll-free numbers, please try the international dial-in number.  

US Dial-in Numbers: 1- 888-407-2553
UK Dial-in Number: 0- 800-917-9141
ISRAEL Dial-in Number: 03- 918-0610
INTERNATIONAL Dial-in Number: +972-3- 918-0610

 
 
       at 9:00am Eastern Time; 6:00am Pacific Time; 2:00pm UK Time; 4:00pm Israel Time  
    This call will also be broadcast live on Elbit Systems' web-site at http://www.elbitsystems.com. An online replay will be available from 24 hours after the call ends.  
    Alternatively, for two days following the call, investors will be able to dial a replay number to listen to the call. The dial-in numbers are:  
             1- 888-782-4291 (US) or +972-3- 925-5925 (Israel and International).  
    About Elbit Systems     
    Elbit Systems Ltd. is an international high technology company engaged in a wide range of defense, homeland security and commercial programs throughout the world. The Company, which includes Elbit Systems and its subsidiaries, operates in the areas of aerospace, land and naval systems, command, control, communications, computers, intelligence surveillance and reconnaissance ("C4ISR"), unmanned aircraft systems, advanced electro-optics, electro-optic space systems, EW suites, signal intelligence systems, data links and communications systems, radios and cyber-based systems.  The Company also focuses on the upgrading of existing platforms, developing new technologies for defense, homeland security and commercial applications and providing a range of support services, including training and simulation systems. For additional information, visit: http://www.elbitsystems.com.  
    This press release contains forward-looking statements (within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) regarding Elbit Systems Ltd. and/or its subsidiaries (collectively the Company), to the extent such statements do not relate to historical or current fact.   Forward Looking Statements are based on management's expectations, estimates, projections and assumptions.   Forward-looking statements are made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, as amended.   These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks and uncertainties, which are difficult to predict.   Therefore, actual future results,  performance and trends may differ materially from these forward-looking statements due to a variety of factors, including, without limitation: scope and length of customer contracts; governmental regulations and approvals; changes in governmental budgeting priorities; general market, political and economic conditions in the countries in which the Company operates or sells, including Israel and the United States among others; differences in anticipated and actual program performance, including the ability to perform under long-term fixed-price contracts; and the outcome of legal and/or regulatory proceedings.   The factors listed above are not all-inclusive, and further information is contained in Elbit Systems Ltd.'s latest annual report on Form 20-F, which is on file with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. All forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this release. The Company does not undertake to update its forward-looking statements.  

Company Contact:
Joseph Gaspar, Executive VP & CFO
Tel:  +972-4-8316663
j.gaspar@elbitsystems.com
Dalia Rosen, VP, Head of Corporate Communications
Tel: +972-4-8316784
dalia.rosen@elbitsystems.com
Elbit Systems Ltd.
IR Contact:
Ehud Helft
Kenny Green
GK Investor Relations
Tel: +1-646-201-9246
elbitsystems@gkir.com

 
 
Elbit Systems Ltd








HTC Makes Premium Smartphones Affordable With New HTC Desire(R) LineupNew HTC Desire smartphones make flagship features and stand-out design affordable and broadly available at prepaid and postpaid carriers beginning this month
BELLEVUE, Wash., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- HTC America Inc., a leader in mobile innovation, announces the release of four new HTC Desire LTE smartphones - the HTC Desire 626, HTC Desire 626s, HTC Desire 526 and HTC Desire 520 - designed to make premium smartphones affordable and accessible to all. HTC brings many of the same features found in its flagship HTC One(R) M9 to a premium and modern design that will withstand the test of time.
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150715/236933
"At HTC, we don't think you should have to sacrifice or settle if you are looking for an affordable smartphone. That is why we are bringing the absolute best affordable smartphones to market with the HTC Desire lineup," said Jason Mackenzie, president of HTC America. "Our Desire smartphones bring the premium experiences, performance and style of our flagship smartphone at an incredible price."
Bold, personal design meets high performance 
The new HTC Desire smartphones represent the intersection of modern style and performance. The seamless construction combined with the latest in color combinations delivers stand-out style that will continue to look great over time. 
The HTC Desire 626 and HTC Desire 626s have a 5-inch screen and come in an array of dual color combinations, including Marshmallow White, Gray Lava, Blue Lagoon, Marine White and White Birch. The HTC Desire 526 has a 4.7-inch screen and comes in Stealth Black, and the HTC Desire 520 has a 4.5-inch screen and comes in Steel Gray.
Personal style isn't only on the surface. With HTC Sense(R) 7, the new HTC Desire smartphones can be customized with HTC Themes, HTC BlinkFeed(R) and HTC Sense Home applications.  
HTC Themes pull color and textural elements from a favorite photo to modify the look of apps, color scheme and home screen. HTC Themes also provides an opportunity to create and share a theme with the HTC community, or just browse and download one created by other HTC users.
The HTC Sense Home is an intelligent widget that automatically curates apps based on usage and location. It is contextually aware of location, time of day and preferred apps at home, work or on the go. While exploring a new city, HTC BlinkFeed intelligently recommends restaurants near you and recommended by friends during mealtimes. 
As LTE devices with quad-core processors, the HTC Desire 626, HTC Desire 626s, HTC Desire 526 and HTC Desire 520 offer speedy uploads and downloads while keeping up with multitasking between apps. A 2000 mAh battery and expandable memory further enhance the power of the new HTC Desire line.
A better way to relive favorite memories 
The HTC Desire 626 and HTC Desire 626s' 5-inch, HD 720 pixel screen beautifully displays photos, video and multimedia content with an immersive smartphone experience. HTC One Gallery syncs with Facebook, Flickr, Google Drive and Dropbox accounts and brings photos together in a single location to make finding, searching and viewing easier than ever.
Zoe(R), a signature HTC app that comes preloaded, makes it especially easy to share visual stories of experiences with friends and family in a more dynamic way.  Zoe Highlights combine favorite photos and video with music to bring the experience to life.  The HTC Desire line comes with an 8MP primary camera and video captured by HD 720p video recording capabilities. The HTC Desire 626 has a 5MP front-facing camera while the HTC Desire 626s, HTC Desire 526 and HTC Desire 520 come with a 2-megapixel front-facing camera. 
Availability
The HTC Desire 626, HTC Desire 626s, HTC Desire 526 and HTC Desire 520 will be widely available in a variety of colors from major prepaid and postpaid U.S. wireless providers including AT&T, Boost Mobile, Cricket, MetroPCS, Sprint Prepaid, T-Mobile, Tracfone, Verizon Wireless and Virgin Mobile USA. Each provider will confirm the colors and models it's carrying, beginning this week and through the coming months. Follow @HTCUSA and visit http://www.htc.com/us/smartphones/htc-desire-626 for more information. 
About HTC
HTC Corporation aims to bring brilliance to life. As a global innovator in smart mobile devices and technology, HTC has produced award-winning products and industry firsts since its inception in 1997, including the critically acclaimed HTC One and HTC Desire lines of smartphones. The pursuit of brilliance is at the heart of everything we do, inspiring best-in-class design and game-changing mobile experiences for consumers around the world. HTC is listed on the Taiwan Stock Exchange (TWSE: 2498). www.htc.com 
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150715/236934
 
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150715/236945
 
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20140827/140427
 
Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236933 
Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236934 
Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236945 
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20140827/140427 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/htc-makes-premium-smartphones-affordable-with-new-htc-desire-lineup-300113484.html


Photo:  https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236933https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236934https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150715/236945http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20140827/140427

HTC


CONTACT:  Eileen Tanner, 213-304-9350, etanner@golin.com 
Web site:  http://www.htc.com/ 





Allot Communications to Host Second Quarter 2015 Earnings Results Conference Call on Tuesday, August 4, 2015-- Call to be held at 8:30 AM ET --
HOD HASHARON, Israel, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ --
 
    Allot Communications Ltd.  will host a conference call to discuss its second quarter 2015 earnings results on Tuesday, August 4th , 2015, at 8:30AM ET/3:30PM Israel time. The quarterly financial results will be published prior to the conference call.  
    To access the conference call, please dial one of the following numbers:  
    US: +1 212 4440896, UK: +44(0)203 3645721, Israel: +972 3 7630147, participant code 1553650.  
    A recording of the conference call will be available from 12:00AM ET on August 5, 2015 for 30 days.      To access the recording, please dial: US:   +1 347 3669565; UK: +44 (0) 203 4270598, access code: 1553650.  
    A live webcast of the conference call can be accessed on the Allot Communications website at http://www.allot.com. The webcast will also be archived on the website following the conference call.  
    About Allot Communications    
    Allot Communications Ltd.  empowers service providers to monetize and optimize their networks, enterprises to enhance productivity and consumers to enjoy an always-on digital lifestyle. Allot's advanced DPI-based broadband solutions identify and leverage network intelligence to analyze, protect, improve and enrich mobile, fixed and cloud service delivery and user experience. Allot's unique blend of innovative technology, proven know-how and collaborative approach to industry standards and partnerships enables network operators worldwide to elevate their role in the digital lifestyle ecosystem and to open the door to a wealth of new business opportunities. For more information, please visit http://www.allot.com.  

Investor Relations Contact:
Rami Rozen
AVP Corporate Development
International access code +972-52-569-4441
rrozen@allot.com

 
 
Allot Communications Ltd.








StyleSeat Announces Closing of $25 Million in Series B Funding
SAN FRANCISCO, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- StyleSeat, the leading destination for beauty and wellness bookings, announces it has raised $25 million in a Series B round of funding. The round, led by Fosun Kinzon Capital, includes Lightspeed Venture Partners, Cowboy Ventures and Slow Ventures, among others. 
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150714/236817LOGO
Founded in 2011, StyleSeat has become the largest and fastest growing platform for booking beauty and wellness appointments. The platform has powered over 20 million appointments since launch and will power over $1 billion in appointments in 2015 alone. From hair stylists, make-up artists, nail technicians and other beauty and wellness experts, StyleSeat has over 320,000 professionals in over 15,000 cities across the United States and has grown almost 100% via word-of-mouth. With StyleSeat, industry experts gain a place to showcase their work, connect with clients and build their business, while consumers can discover experts as well as book appointments on the go.
"With its vision of being the platform to support beauty artists, StyleSeat provides more and better services to users. We always believe in platforms that provide better services, increasing the efficiency, and enabling those creates value to capture more of it," said Brad Bao, Managing Partner at Fosun Kinzon Capital. 
"StyleSeat is uniquely positioned, led by a passionate and tech-savvy team that's perfect to achieve the goal. We are proud to support the reforming of how beauty business is done today, leveraging our expertise in building synergies among Fosun's fashion and lifestyle industries, including brands like St. John, Caruso, Cirque du Soleil and Club Med among others," he added. 
StyleSeat has also appointed seasoned go-to market strategist Scot Gensler as Vice President, Business and Corporate Development. Gensler has a history of driving needle-moving growth via business development and corporate strategy leadership positions with companies like Current Media, Sony's Crackle (formerly Grouper Networks) and Livefyre.
"Our obsession with helping style professionals have better, more profitable businesses that serve consumers in superior ways has resulted in StyleSeat becoming the category leader. We are excited to rapidly expand upon this base and drive even more innovative developments for our consumers and style professionals with the help of Fosun Kinzon Capital which has expertise building luxury brands internationally," said Melody McCloskey, CEO and Co-Founder of StyleSeat. She adds, "We're delighted to add Scot Gensler to our executive team, to add firepower to our strategic partnership capabilities and really add gasoline to the strong platform we've created," continues McCloskey. 
"I'm thrilled to be joining StyleSeat at such a critical juncture for the company and industry," Gensler said. "The opportunity to lead the $200B+ global beauty space into the 21(st) Century and help StyleSeat expand its leadership position via new and surprising partnership and growth strategies is incredibly exciting."
ABOUT STYLESEAT: StyleSeat is the leading destination for booking beauty and wellness appointments. McCloskey co-founded StyleSeat in 2011 with business partner Dan Levine to simplify the appointment booking process.  More than 320,000 beauty professionals in over 15,000 cities use the platform today and clients use StyleSeat to book everything from haircuts to manicures and facials.  With StyleSeat, industry experts gain a place to showcase their work, connect with clients, and build their business, while clients can discover new services and stylists and book appointments on the go.  For more information please visit www.styleseat.com 
ABOUT FOSUN KINZON CAPITAL: Fosun was established in Shanghai in 1992. Fosun International Limited (00656.HK) was listed on the Main Board of The Stock Exchange of Hong Kong Limited on 16 July 2007. Fosun has been persistently taking roots in China and investing in China's growth fundamentals. It has been actively implementing its investment model of "Combining China's Growth Momentum with Global Resources", with a view to making a major stride towards becoming a world-class investment group underpinned by the twin drivers of "insurance-oriented comprehensive financial capability" and "global industrial integration capability taking roots in China". Today, Fosun's businesses include two major segments, integrated finance and industrial operations.
Fosun Kinzon Capital was founded in April 2013 with $350 million under management. It invests in early stage technology ventures with a focus on mobile enabled healthcare, social and communications, as well as financial technology. With professional investment team based in the US and China, the fund is aiming to invest in ambitious and capable teams and support them to become global leaders in their respective industries.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236817LOGO 

Media ContactJONESWORKSStyleSeat@JONESWORKS.COM212.839.0111
FOSUN KINZON CAPITALKate Zhaokatezhao@fosun.com
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/styleseat-announces-closing-of-25-million-in-series-b-funding-300113436.html


Photo:  https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236817LOGO

StyleSeat


Web site:  http://www.styleseat.com/ 





DirectView Announces Plans to Connect Its Body-Worn Cameras and Security Products to America's Largest 4G LTE Network
NEW YORK, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- DirectView Holdings, Inc.  ("DirectView" or the "Company"), a company focused on ownership and management of leading video and security technology companies, today announced plans for its body-worn cameras and other security related products to be connected to America's largest 4G LTE network. 
DirectView has begun working with the carrier to establish the necessary specifications to enable its devices to seamlessly connect to the network for full streaming video and data transfer.  Through the carrier's network, business, security or law enforcement personnel using a DirectView device will be able to easily transfer from networked communications to 4G LTE cellular transmissions in areas where secure networks are unavailable or simply desired. Upon completion of integration and certification with the network and finalization of partnership agreements with the carrier, DirectView will be uniquely positioned in the marketplace through its ability to offer a full suite of connectivity options with its body-worn-cameras.  This is will also allow the company to generate a monthly recurring revenue model stream.
Roger Ralston, CEO and Board Chairman of DirectView, said, "We are very excited to provide this update and are looking forward to the future possibilities.  Adding connectivity with the largest 4G LTE network in North America is a large part of our strategic plan to differentiate DirectView's streaming security products from any others in the marketplace.  This truly makes us unique.  Upon successfully enabling connectivity with this premier 4G LTE carrier we will take a major step forward in reaching that goal.  We intend to work diligently to become a valued partner with this carrier as we move steadily toward the full product launch of our body-worn-cameras later in the second half of 2015.  Upon completion our products will be additionally co-marketed with this provider."
About DirectView Holdings, Inc.
DirectView Holdings, Inc., together with its subsidiaries, provides video surveillance solutions and teleconferencing products and services to businesses and organizations. The company operates in two divisions, Security (Video Surveillance) and Video Conferencing. The Security division offers technologies in surveillance systems providing onsite and remote video and audio surveillance, digital video recording, and services. It also sells and installs surveillance systems; and sells maintenance agreements. The company sells its products and services in the United States and internationally through direct sales force, referrals, and its Websites. The Video Conferencing division offers teleconferencing products and services that enable clients to conduct remote meetings by linking participants in geographically dispersed locations. It is involved in the sale of conferencing services based upon usage, the sale and installation of video equipment, and the sale of maintenance agreements. This division primarily provides conferencing products and services to numerous organizations ranging from law firms, banks, high tech companies and government organizations. For more information visit our website at www.DirectView.com and connect with us on Twitter, LinkedIn, Facebook, and Google+.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward Looking Statements
Forward Looking Statements: This press release contains forward-looking statements that involve a number of risks and uncertainties, including statements regarding the outlook of the Company's business and results of operations. By nature, these risks and uncertainties could cause actual results to differ materially from those indicated. Generally speaking, any statements using terms such as "will," "expect," "anticipate," or "may," or which otherwise predict or address future results or events, are likely to contain forward-looking statements. It is important to note that actual results may differ materially from what is indicated in any forward-looking statement. Readers should consider any forward-looking statements in light of factors that could cause actual results to vary. These factors are described in our filings with the SEC, and readers should refer to those filings, including Risk Factors described in those filings, in connection with any forward-looking statements. The Company disclaims any intention or obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Contact:
DirectView Holdings, Inc.Roger Ralston+1-212-858-9100 EXT. 111www.DirectView.com IR@DirectView.com 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/directview-announces-plans-to-connect-its-body-worn-cameras-and-security-products-to-americas-largest-4g-lte-network-300113560.html
DirectView Holdings, Inc.


Web site:  http://www.directview.com/ 





Smith Micro Software Schedules Teleconference to Discuss Second Quarter 2015 Financial Results
ALISO VIEJO, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Smith Micro Software, Inc. , a leading provider of wireless and mobility solutions, today announced that it will report its second quarter 2015 financial results following the close of regular trading on Monday, July 27, 2015. The news release will be followed by a teleconference available to all interested parties at 1:30 pm Pacific Time.
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150408/197501LOGO
The Smith Micro second quarter 2015 results may be accessed as follows:

Date and Time:    Monday, July 27, 2015, 1:30 pm PT / 4:30 pm ET.
News Release:     Available at the Smith Micro's News Room.
Teleconference:    Dial 888-523-1228 ten minutes prior to the start of the call. International participants can call 719-785-1753.
The participant passcode is 9588957.
Internet Webcast:                                                                  https://www.webcaster4.com/Webcast/Page/892/9394
------------------------------------------------
Replay:           The conference call webcast will be available for replay in the Smith Micro Investor Relations section.

About Smith Micro Software, Inc.:
Smith Micro provides software to simplify and enhance the mobile experience. As the leader in wireless connectivity, our applications ensure the best Quality of Experience for mobile users while optimizing networks for service providers and enterprises.  Using our intelligent policy-on-device platform, along with premium voice, video and content monetization services, we create new opportunities to engage consumers and capitalize on the growth of connected devices.  For more information, visit smithmicro.com.  
Safe Harbor Statement: 
This release contains forward-looking statements that involve risks and uncertainties, including without limitation, forward-looking statements relating to the company's customer concentration given that the majority of our sales depend on a few large client relationships, including Sprint, the risk of being delisted from the NASDAQ Global Select Market if we fail to meet any of the listing requirements, financial prospects and other projections of its performance, the existence of new market opportunities and interest in the company's products and solutions, and the company's ability to increase its revenue by capitalizing on these new market opportunities. Among the important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in the forward-looking statements are the risk that we may need to raise additional capital to fund our operations and such capital may not be available to us at commercially reasonable terms or at all, changes in demand for the company's products from its customers and their end-users, new and changing technologies, customer acceptance and timing of deployment of those technologies, and the company's ability to compete effectively with other software companies. These and other factors discussed in the company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including our filings on Forms 10-K and 10-Q, could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in any forward-looking statements. The forward-looking statements contained in this release are made on the basis of the views and assumptions of management regarding future events and business performance as of the date of this release, and the company does not undertake any obligation to update these statements to reflect events or circumstances occurring after the date of this release.
Smith Micro and the Smith Micro logo are registered trademarks or trademarks of Smith Micro Software, Inc. Third-party trademarks mentioned are the property of their respective owners. The use of the word partner does not imply a partnership relationship between Smith Micro and any other company.

AT THE COMPANY:   IR INQUIRIES:
Suzanne Runald    Todd Kehrli or Jim Byers
Public Relations  MKR Group, Inc.
949-362-5800      323-468-2300
pr@smithmicro.com smsi@mkr-group.com

Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150408/197501LOGO 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/smith-micro-software-schedules-teleconference-to-discuss-second-quarter-2015-financial-results-300113443.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150408/197501LOGO

Smith Micro Software, Inc.


Web site:  http://smithmicro.com/ 





UniPixel Relocates Corporate Headquarters to Silicon Valley and opens Taiwan OfficeManufacturing operations will continue in Colorado Springs, CO

SAN JOSE, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- UniPixel, Inc. , a provider of Performance Engineered Films(TM) to the touch screen and flexible printed electronics markets, announced today that it will relocate its corporate headquarters from The Woodlands, Texas to Santa Clara, California, in the Silicon Valley region. Additionally, the company has established a sales office in Taiwan to support customers and partners throughout Asia. 
Jeffrey A. Hawthorne, chief executive officer of UniPixel, said, "As we begin concentrating our sales and marketing efforts on driving revenue expansion, it makes sense for a technologically advanced company such as UniPixel to base its headquarters in the heart of Silicon Valley. There is unique technology infrastructure and expertise in this region that we believe is unmatched anywhere in the world. I believe that UniPixel will benefit from this infrastructure and the talent that it attracts as we move forward in executing our strategic business plan."
Mr. Hawthorne continued, "In April 2015 the Company acquired a touchscreen technology, a manufacturing facility, and customer relationships from Atmel Corporation. We believe that the acquisition of these assets will validate our technology and manufacturing processes. Leveraging the infrastructure of the acquired engineering and marketing teams, which were already based in Silicon Valley, was a logical step as we continue building our business. Furthermore, our new Taiwan sales office provides a base from which to support current and future customers and supply chain partners throughout Asia."
All manufacturing operations will remain in Colorado Springs, and the Company will maintain an engineering laboratory currently located in The Woodlands, Texas staffed with talented technical employees.  
The Company's new corporate headquarters will be located at 4699 Old Ironsides Drive, Santa Clara, California, and its new Taiwan office will be located at 7F, No.46, Wenhua 2nd Rd, Guishan Dist, Taoyuan City, 33377, Taiwan.
About UniPixelUniPixel, Inc.  is developing Performance Engineered Films for the display and flexible electronics markets. A key focus for UniPixel is developing electronic conductive films for use in electronic sensors for consumer and industrial applications. The company's roll-to-roll electronics manufacturing process prints fine line conductive elements on thin films. The company intends to market its films for touch panel sensor, cover glass replacement, protective cover film, antenna and custom circuitry applications under the UniPixel label, and intends to eventually expand its marketing to private label or Original Equipment Manufacturer (OEM) brands. For further information, visit www.unipixel.com. 

Forward-looking StatementsAll statements in this news release that are not based on historical fact are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 and the provisions of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended including the statement that the acquisition of certain assets from Atmel, Inc. will validate our technology and manufacturing processes. While management has based any forward-looking statements contained herein on its current expectations, the information on which such expectations were based may change. These forward-looking statements rely on a number of assumptions concerning future events and are subject to a number of risks, uncertainties, and other factors, many of which are outside of our control, that could cause actual results to materially differ from such statements. Such risks, uncertainties, and other factors include, but are not necessarily limited to, those set forth under Item 1A "Risk Factors" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014. We operate in a highly competitive and rapidly changing environment, thus new or unforeseen risks may arise. Accordingly, investors should not place any reliance on forward-looking statements as a prediction of actual results. We disclaim any intention to, and undertake no obligation to, update or revise any forward-looking statements. Readers are also urged to carefully review and consider the other various disclosures in the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K.
Trademarks in this release are the property of their respective owners
Contact:Joe Diaz, Robert Blum, Joe DorameLytham Partners, LLC602-889-9700unxl@lythampartners.com
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/unipixel-relocates-corporate-headquarters-to-silicon-valley-and-opens-taiwan-office-300113372.html
UniPixel, Inc.


Web site:  http://www.unipixel.com/ 





61% of Mobile Workers Trust Their Employer to Keep Personal Information Private on Their Mobile Devices2015 MobileIron Trust Gap Survey Measures Employees' Changing Expectations of Privacy
MOUNTAIN VIEW, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- More and more work is being done using personal mobile devices and employees expect employers to keep personal information private on those devices, according to new research from MobileIron . The 2015 MobileIron Trust Gap Survey, released today, examines the privacy expectations workers have when using a mobile device for work. The online research conducted by Harris Poll on behalf of MobileIron surveyed more than 3,500 employed adults who use a mobile device for work in France, Germany, Japan, Spain, the UK, and the US ("workers").
Experience the interactive Multimedia News Release here: http://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy/
"Mobile workers, especially younger workers, have an expectation of privacy when using mobile devices for work. Many would leave their jobs if their employer could see personal information on their device," said Ojas Rege, Vice President, Strategy, MobileIron. "In a world where smartphones contain increasing amounts of sensitive personal data, CIOs must remember that every device is a mixed-use device and must protect employee privacy as fiercely as corporate security."
For more information, please visit: https://www.mobileiron.com/Trust-Gap. Resources include:

--  Infographic: Employees expect privacy on mobile devices
--  White Paper: The State of the Trust Gap in 2015
--  Blog: To become a trusted advisor, IT must close the Trust Gap with
users
--  Webinar: "Meet security requirements without compromising privacy."
Register here to join MobileIron on August 8 at 10AM PT.

Workers expect employers to keep personal information private 
The research found that 86% of mobile workers own the smartphone they use for work purposes, as do 37% of tablet users. 61% trust their employer to keep their personal information private on their mobile device. 30% of people would leave their job if their employer could see their personal information, such as personal emails, texts, or photos, on their smartphone or tablet.
Though the vast majority of these workers trust employers to keep personal information private on mobile devices, they are still concerned about specific types of personal data. Compared to the first Trust Gap Survey conducted in 2013 by Vision Critical, mobile workers are not comfortable with their employer seeing the following:

--  Personal email and attachments: 52% (down 14%)
--  Personal contacts: 49% (down 10%)
--  Texts/instant messages: 48% (down 15%)
--  Voicemails: 45% (down 10%)
--  Details of phone calls and internet usage: 45% (down 8%)
--  The information in all the mobile apps on my device: 44% (down 10%)
--  Location: 42% (down 6%)
--  List of all the apps on the device: 41% (down 5%)

Gen M workers are more comfortable with employers seeing personal information 
Gen M workers, defined as mobile workers who are either men age 18-34 or people with children under age 18 in their households, are more likely than non-Gen M workers to be comfortable with their employer seeing personal information on their mobile device. Among Gen M workers, 62% are comfortable with their employer seeing at least some personal information on their mobile devices, compared to 51% of non-Gen M workers.
Gen M workers are more likely to be more comfortable with their employer seeing:

--  Location: 43% (non-Gen M workers: 34%)
--  List of all the apps on the device: 43% (non-Gen M workers: 33%)
--  Details of phone calls and Internet usage: 41% (non-Gen M workers: 31%)
--  The information in all the mobile apps on my device: 40% (non-Gen M
workers 29%)
--  Texts/instant messages: 38% (non-Gen M workers 26%)
--  Voicemails: 37% (non-Gen M workers 29%)
--  Personal contacts: 37% (non-Gen M workers 25%)
--  Personal email and attachments: 34% (non-Gen M workers 22%)

Global highlights

--  Of the six countries in the survey, workers in Germany are the most
likely (74%) to trust their employer to keep their personal information
on their mobile device private.
--  This is in contrast to workers in the Japan who are the least likely
(53%) to trust their employer to keep personal information on their
mobile device private.
--  Spanish workers are the most likely (52%) to think their employer can
see any information on their mobile device.
--  Male workers in the UK (49%) are significantly more likely than female
workers in the UK (35%) to believe that their employer can see personal
and corporate information on their mobile device.
--  French workers are the most likely (71%) to be comfortable with their
employer seeing personal information on their mobile devices.
--  Male workers in the US (64%) are significantly more likely than female
workers in the US (55%) to be comfortable with their employer seeing
personal information on their mobile device.

The facts: what the employer could actually see, depending on its policies*

--  Carrier and country
--  Make, model, OS version
--  Device identifiers (e.g. IMEI)
--  Phone number
--  Complete list of apps installed
--  Location of device (opt-in for the end user)
--  Battery level
--  Storage capacity and use
--  Corporate email and attachments
--  Corporate contacts

The facts: what the employer cannot see*

--  Information in apps - unless the app has been built to transmit
information to a corporate server
--  Personal email and attachments
--  Texts
--  Photos
--  Videos
--  Personal Web browsing activity
--  Voicemails

*Represents visibility on iOS, but will vary by mobile operating system and employer policy.
What employers can do to meet employee trust expectations
When employees trust their employer to protect their privacy, they more quickly adopt new mobile enterprise services and BYOD programs. To drive trust, employers should consider the following:

--  Establish clear and logical policies
--  Communicate them clearly
--  Make privacy information obvious and accessible to employees
--  Use the privacy controls available in mobile operating systems

Download the white paper for more details and a review of operating system privacy capabilities: https://www.mobileiron.com/en/whitepaper/trust-gap-2015.
Trust Gap Survey methodology
From December 17, 2014 to January 22, 2015, Harris Poll conducted an online survey on behalf of MobileIron of 3,521 full- or part-time workers who use a mobile device for work purposes in France (502), Germany (501), Japan (503), Spain (500), UK (503), and US (1012). Gen M (1,702) is defined as those who are male aged 18-34 or those with children in the household under 18. The sample was weighted to the populations in each country by age, race/ethnicity, education, region, and household income data. MobileIron issued the original Trust Gap Study in July 2013, and the Gen M Study in April 2015.
About MobileIron
MobileIron provides the secure foundation for companies around the world to transform into Mobile First organizations. For more information, please visit www.mobileiron.com.
https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20150714/236685-INFO

http://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy/gallery/image/3fcb9f43-c419-4d68-9e1c-e0350c6e0129.HR.jpg

http://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy/gallery/image/92150ef1-0d04-42b4-a644-212692e3a9e1.HR.jpg

http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20140923/147891

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/61-of-mobile-workers-trust-their-employer-to-keep-personal-information-private-on-their-mobile-devices-300113293.html


Video:  http://origin-qps.onstreammedia.com/origin/multivu_archive/MNR/7423152_TrustGap_0713.mp4http://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy



Photo:  https://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20150714/236685-INFOhttp://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20140923/147891http://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy/gallery/image/3fcb9f43-c419-4d68-9e1c-e0350c6e0129.HR.jpghttp://www.multivu.com/players/English/7423152-mobileiron-survey-mobile-device-privacy/gallery/image/92150ef1-0d04-42b4-a644-212692e3a9e1.HR.jpg

MobileIron


CONTACT:  Sara Day, MobileIron, sara@mobileiron.com, +1-650-336-3123 





Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SA and Cassiopea S.p.A. Select DATATRAK Unified Platform for Global StudyLong Term Partnership Extended
CLEVELAND, July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- DATATRAK International, Inc. (OTCQX: DTRK), the leader in developing cloud-based, unified dClinical((TM)) technologies and delivering related services for the clinical trials industry, today announced that Cassiopea S.p.A., the newly IPO'd former subsidiary of longtime partner Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SA has selected DATATRAK for a significant global study.
"Technology should support clinical research, not complicate it," said Laurence P. Birch, Chairman and CEO, DATATRAK. "As long time DATATRAK users, Cosmo Pharmaceuticals knows firsthand that we simplify clinical research. We look forward to supporting the vital research of Cassiopeia and delivering an exceptional customer experience," concluded Birch.
"Success in clinical research requires software that lets us focus on the trial. It must be easy to use, protect patients, and provide insight on demand. DATATRAK delivers technology that supports our work without adding complicated processes," said Louise Dube, Director of R&D of Cassiopea S.p.A.
DATATRAK is a worldwide technology and consulting company delivering digital clinical solutions and related services for the clinical trials industry. The company delivers a portfolio of software solutions through the unified dClinical((TM)) platform, safely accelerating clinical research, from Concept to Cure((R)).
Join DATATRAK Thought Leaders:

--  Twitter
--  LinkedIn
--  SlideShare
--  The DATATRAK Blog

Tweet: Cosmo Pharmaceuticals extends DATATRAK partnership for upcoming Cassiopea global trial http://ow.ly/PBVAw
About DATATRAK International, Inc.
DATATRAK International is a worldwide technology and services company delivering unified dClinical((TM)) solutions and related services for the clinical trials industry. DATATRAK built its multi-component, comprehensive solution on a single, unified platform and expanded this concept to include services delivery via DATATRAK's Clinical and Consulting Services group. The Company delivers a complete portfolio of software products designed to accelerate the reporting of clinical research data from sites to sponsors and ultimately regulatory authorities, faster and more efficiently than loosely integrated technologies. The DATATRAK ONE((R)) software solution, deployed worldwide through an ASP or Enterprise Transfer offering, supports Preclinical and Phase I - Phase IV drug and device studies in multiple languages throughout the world. DATATRAK is located in Chicago, Illinois; Cleveland, Ohio; Bryan, Texas; Cary (RTP), North Carolina; and Plymouth, Minnesota.  For more information, visit http://www.datatrak.com.
Except for the historical information contained in this press release, the statements made in this release are forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are made based on management's expectations, assumptions, estimates and current beliefs concerning the operations, future results and prospects of the Company and are subject to uncertainties and factors which are difficult to predict and, in many instances, are beyond the control of the Company, and which could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward-looking statements. For a list of certain factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in these forward looking statements, please see the Company's report filed with the OTCQX Market on March 13, 2015 announcing its results for the full-year period ended December 31, 2014. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly or revise any forward-looking statement whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
About Cassiopea 
Cassiopea is a clinical-stage specialty pharmaceutical company focused on developing and commercializing innovative and differentiated medical dermatology products. Initial focus is on the topical treatment of acne, androgenic alopecia (or AGA) and genital warts. The portfolio comprises four unencumbered clinical candidates, for which Cassiopea owns the worldwide rights. For further information on Cassiopea, please visit www.cassiopea.com.
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/cosmo-pharmaceuticals-sa-and-cassiopea-spa-select-datatrak-unified-platform-for-global-study-300113370.html
DATATRAK International, Inc.


CONTACT:  Dorothy Radke, Director Marketing, DATATRAK International, Inc.,+1-440-443-0082 
Web site:  http://www.datatrak.net/ 





Trimble Establishes Four BuildingPoint Distribution Partners in Australia, New Zealand and the U.S. to Serve Building Construction IndustryBuildingPoint Partners--Dedicated Global Distribution Network for Technologies Spanning the Design-Build-Operate (DBO) Lifecycle
SUNNYVALE, Calif., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Trimble  announced today that BuildingPoint(R) distribution partners have been established in Australia, New Zealand and the U.S. These latest additions are part of the growing BuildingPoint network that provides focused sales and services with a portfolio of software and hardware solutions for the Design-Build-Operate (DBO) lifecycle of buildings.
BuildingPoint distribution partners represent Trimble Buildings' solutions that allow users to create and transfer constructible models throughout the DBO lifecycle--from concept and design to the field and back to the office again. The solutions utilize sensors, 3D positioning, data, Building Information Modeling (BIM), communications and analytics. The emergence of these technologies, along with the ability to integrate them within a comprehensive information architecture, provides an unprecedented capability to improve productivity, schedule adherence and cost discipline. Trimble's expanded information architecture enables these improvements by significantly improving project transparency and collaboration, which leads to much tighter integration of the elements of building design, building construction and post-completion building operation.
BuildingPoint will provide a primary vehicle for bringing Trimble's DBO solutions to the market. Experienced construction professionals in each regional BuildingPoint will support users in achieving the optimal construction technology solution for each project. This support will consist of a combination of hardware and software, consulting, virtual design and construction services, personalized training and technical support.
Trimble is establishing a network of BuildingPoint distribution partners in the Americas, Europe and Asia/Pacific regions. For more information on BuildingPoint Distribution Partners, visit:  www.buildingpoint.com.
The latest additions to the BuildingPoint network are:


--  BuildingPoint Australia:  BuildingPoint Australia was formed by
combining the Prolog(R) dealer CADStation, the Tekla dealer Pacific
Computing, and Trimble Mechanical, Electrical and Plumbing (MEP) dealer
Sure Point Australia. Headquartered in Brisbane and with locations
throughout the region, BuildingPoint Australia will serve major building
construction stakeholders including building facility and asset owners,
engineers, architects, and general and specialty contractors in
Australia and Papua New Guinea.  www.buildingpoint.com.au
--  BuildingPoint New Zealand:  BuildingPoint New Zealand was formed through
collaboration between GeoSystems, the long-term Trimble distributor in
New Zealand, and BuildingPoint Australia Pty Ltd. Headquartered in
Christchurch and with locations throughout the region, BuildingPoint New
Zealand will bring Trimble's DBO solutions to New Zealand and the
Pacific Islands.  www.buildingpoint.co.nz
--  BuildingPoint Pacific:  BuildingPoint Pacific was formed from two
dealers: the building construction field solution business of SITECH
NorCal and the Prolog project management business of Rotech Consulting.
With offices planned in the Bay Area and San Diego, BuildingPoint
Pacific serves contractors and construction managers in California and
Hawaii.  www.buildingpointpacific.com
--  BuildingPoint Gulf Coast: BuildingPoint Gulf Coast was formed by
Navigation Electronics Inc. (NEI), a Trimble GeoSpatial dealer, and
BuildingPoint Midwest, which was established in July 2014 and is based
in Aurora, Ill. BuildingPoint Gulf Coast will focus on Trimble
Buildings' solutions for contractors and construction managers
throughout Louisiana, Alabama and Mississippi.
http://gulfcoast.buildingpointpartners.com

About Trimble Buildings
Trimble Buildings, a part of Trimble's Engineering and Construction segment, is a world leader in solutions that optimize the complete Design-Build-Operate (DBO) lifecycle of buildings. Incorporating the Trimble Connect collaboration platform and spanning top brands such as SketchUp, Tekla, Gehry Technologies, Proliance, Prolog, Vico Office, WinEst, Accubid, Manhattan Software, and more, Trimble's product and professional service offerings improve productivity, visibility and data interoperability, from simulation to renovation. Used in over 150 countries around the world and supported by a global dealer and distribution partner network, Trimble technology is a mainstay of the building industry.
Information on Trimble Buildings' DBO portfolio is available at:  http://buildings.trimble.com.
About Trimble
Trimble applies technology to make field and mobile workers in businesses and government significantly more productive. Solutions are focused on applications requiring positioning or location, including surveying, construction, agriculture, fleet and asset management, public safety and mapping. In addition to utilizing positioning technologies such as GPS, lasers and optics, Trimble solutions may include software content specific to the needs of the user. Wireless technologies are utilized to deliver the solution to the user in the field and to ensure communication between the field and the office. Founded in 1978, Trimble is headquartered in Sunnyvale, Calif.
For more information, visit: www.trimble.com.
GTRMB

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/trimble-establishes-four-buildingpoint-distribution-partners-in-australia-new-zealand-and-the-us-to-serve-building-construction-industry-300113472.html
Trimble


CONTACT:  Lea Ann McNabb, Media, +1 408-481-7808, leaann_mcnabb@trimble.com 
Web site:  http://www.trimble.com/ 





Zebra Technologies to Sponsor, Present at Inaugural APPNATION IoT Influencers SummitIoT focus also includes participation in Atmel Tech on Tour Chicago event
LINCOLNSHIRE, Ill., July 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Zebra Technologies Corporation , a global leader in solutions and services that provide real-time visibility into organizations' assets, people and transactions, announced today it will be a presenting Pioneer Sponsor at the inaugural APPNATION IoT Influencers Summit, bringing together the industry's top decision makers, business developers and leading influencers to discuss the emerging business need for the Internet of Things (IoT).
http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20140731/132232
The APPNATION IoT Influencers Summit will take place on July 21, 2015 at Levi's Stadium in Santa Clara, California. The opening keynote will begin at 9 AM PT. Zebra will exhibit its new interactive IoT light board, and attendees can take in the Zebra Vertical Jump Challenge at booth #4. On July 20, Zebra's Zatar IoT platform team will also participate in the Atmel(R) Tech on Tour stopping by 1871 at the Merchandise Mart, Chicago's premiere innovation hub.
 KEY FACTS ON APPNATION

--  Zebra Technologies' Jill Stelfox will participate in the Connected Fan
Experience panel at 10:55 AM PT on Stage 1A. This roundtable will cover
the ways technology is improving the fan experience through beacons and
sensors installed in sporting venues. Zebra is the "Official On-Field
Player-Tracking Provider" of the National Football League.
--  Phil Gerskovich, also of Zebra, will lead the Simplifying IoT Solutions
session. As IoT becomes more relevant in the enterprise, there is a need
for businesses to build their own IoT applications that increase
visibility into operations and drive better decision-making. At 4:15 PM
PT on stage 1A, the session will focus on ways the industry can meet
this demand through emerging enterprise software, including Zebra's
Zatar platform.
--  The three key areas of focus at the Summit are market development and
the latest findings within the IoT economy, the business case for IoT
apps, and leveraging IoT to increase consumer engagement.

KEY FACTS ON ATMEL TECH ON TOUR

--  Zatar wine rack demo showcasing a connected IoT experience will be
featured on the tour truck.
--  Gerskovich will be speaking at 5:15 pm CT about IoT and what is driving
it.
--  Hosted by the Connected Intelligence Foundation, IoT Day will bring
together leading companies for a day of hands-on learning and executive
insight on how IoT is gaining traction on a massive scale.

SUPPORTING QUOTES
Phil Gerskovich, senior vice president, New Growth Platforms, Zebra Technologies
"Zebra is proud to be participating in both of these important events. We look forward to sharing the many visibility and intelligence benefits that IoT applications, like our Zatar platform, can provide to the business world."
Jill Stelfox, vice president and general manager, Location Solutions, Zebra Technologies
"The advancement of real-time technology in the sporting world has changed the way fans, teams and networks experience and analyze the game. We are excited to discuss the opportunities for IoT to impact the sports industry and Zebra's leadership on the field with our real-time player tracking solution."
SUPPORTING RESOURCES
Website: Zebra Technologies
Website: Zatar
Website: IoT Influencers Summit
Facebook:  Zebra Technologies
Twitter: @ZebraTechnology
About Zebra Technologies
Zebra  makes businesses as smart and connected as the world we live in. Zebra tracking and visibility solutions transform the physical to digital, creating the data streams enterprises need to simplify operations, know more about their businesses, and empower their mobile workforces. For more information, visit www.zebra.com/possibilities.
About Atmel
Atmel is a worldwide leader in the design and manufacture of microcontrollers, capacitive touch solutions, advanced logic, mixed-signal, nonvolatile memory and radio frequency (RF) components. Leveraging one of the industry's broadest intellectual property (IP) technology portfolios, Atmel is able to provide the electronics industry with intelligent and connected solutions focused on the industrial, automotive, consumer, communications and computing markets.
Media Contact:
Therese Van Ryne
Zebra Technologies
Phone: +1-847-370-2317 
therese.vanryne@zebra.com
Industry Analyst Contact:
Carolyn Buerger
Zebra Technologies
Phone: +1-224-316-0066 
carolyn.buerger@zebra.com
Zebra Technologies, Zebra and the Zebra logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Zebra Technologies Corporation and are used under license. Atmel(R) is a registered trademark of Atmel Corporation in the U.S. and/or other countries. Third-party trademarks mentioned are the property of their respective owners. (C)2015 Zebra Technologies Corporation. All rights reserved.
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20140731/132232

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zebra-technologies-to-sponsor-present-at-inaugural-appnation-iot-influencers-summit-300113339.html


Photo:  http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20140731/132232

Zebra Technologies Corporation


Web site:  http://www.zebra.com/ 


 page 1     page 2     page 3     

News archive of August 2017
1  2  3  4  5  6  7  8  9  10  11  12  13  14  15  16  17  18  19  20  21  22  23  24  25  26  27  28  29  30  31 
News Archives of July 2015
1   2   3   4   5   6   7   8   9   10   11   12   13   14   15   16   17   18   19   20   21   22   23   24   25   26   27   28   29   30   31   News Archives other dates
     2017:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2016:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2015:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2014:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2013:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2012:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2011:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2010:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2009:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2008:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2007:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     
     2006:   Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug     Sep     Oct     Nov     Dec     		





			 
		

0-C     D-L     M-R     S-Z     
Datasheet begin, distributors inventory


123456789101112131415161718192021
0123456789ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ


 © 2004-2017  digchip.com





 








FONU2 Inc FONU Profile-Financials-Revenues-Growth-Market-Description                         Please wait while the search results are loading...     Plunkett Research,® Ltd.Our Market Research = Your Smart Decisions  What are you looking for?    Information Marketing & Research PROS   Information for Students & Professors   Subscribers Log In     Home >  Industries  >  E-Commerce & Internet  > FONU2 Inc   Plunkett Research Online: FONU2 Inc    FONU2 INC (FONU:PINX) Company Profile, Corporate Revenues, Growth, Market Size, Analysis, Business Forecasts, Market Share, Metrics, SWOTFONU2 Inc., formerly Zaldiva Inc., operates an ecommerce website for buying and selling of goods. Sellers can set their service or item price, local area and get paid. Buyers can search for sellers providing a local service or item for sale...... FONU2 Inc  Ticker: FONUExchange: PINXParent Company: Year Established: Employees: Fiscal Year Ends in  Phone: 954 938-4133Fax: Address: 135 Goshen Road ExtSuite 205Rincon, GA 31326 United States MapTypes Of Business Industry Ranks  Total RevenueMarket CapEmployee CountNet IncomeRevenue 3Y GrowthIncome 3Y GrowthReturn on Assets (%)Return on Equity (%)Return on Invested Capital (%) Industry NAICS code:  Electronic Shopping Refreshing... Contacts Excel TextDescription Robert LeesCFO/Chairman of the Board/Director/PresidentJeremy Van CollerDirector/COO See More FONU2 Inc., formerly Zaldiva Inc., operates an ecommerce website for buying and selling of goods. Sellers can set their service or item price, local area and get paid. Buyers can search for sellers providing a local service or item for sale......See More See More Auditor: MaloneBailey, LLP Legal Advisor:    Financial Details  Compare to Industry Averages  Build Custom Table  Compare Companies $USD, In whole numbers,  except marked * or %201520142013201120102009Financials    Revenue    Cost of Revenue    Gross  Margin %    R&D Expense    Operating  Income    Operating  Margin %    SGA Expense    Net  Income    Earnings Per Share    Dividends    Book Value Per Share    Operating  Cash  Flow    Capital  Expenditure    Free  Cash  FlowProfitability    EBITDA    Return on Assets %    Return on Equity %    Net  Margin %    Assets  Turnover    Financial  LeverageBrands, Divisions and AffiliatesTop Salaries  Other ThoughtsCorporate CultureApparent Female Officers or Directors:     Javascript is disabled.    Request Free Trial Subscriptions Plans & Pricing500 Industries Analyzed for Market Size, Profits and Forecasts25,000 Companies Profiled, Ranked100,000 Industry Statistics150,000 Industry Executives Profiled1,000,000 Words of Trends Analysis Printed Almanacs and Ebooks Custom Research ProjectsA REPRESENTATIVE LIST OF ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE USED OUR RESEARCH PRODUCTS:         Take a TourHow to Use Plunkett Research Online-8 MinutesPlunkett Online AccessPlunkett Research BooksContactPhone: 713.932.0000Alternate Phone: 713.961.3282Fax: 713.932.7080E-Mail UsAsk a Product QuestionMedia Interviews, Get a SpeakerCustom ResearchInternational Distributors ListNews & RSSTestimonials  Your tool is very comprehensive and immensely useful. The vertical marketing tool is very helpful, for it assists us in that venue, as well as targeting customers’ competition for new sales…The comprehensive material is absolutely fabulous. I am very impressed, I have to say! Tammy Dalton, National Account Manager, MCI, Tammy Dalton  We are especially trying to push Plunkett since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use.  St. John’s College, Library Services  I’m amazed at how much information is available and the various ways to access it. This will be a major resource for our serious job seekers.  Penn State University, Career Services  I really appreciate the depth you were able to get to so quickly (for our project). The team has looked through the material and are very happy with the data you pulled together.  Marketing Manager, Hilton Worldwide  Plunkett Research Online is an excellent resource…the database contains a wealth of useful data on sectors and companies, which is easy to search and well presented.   Help and advice on how to conduct, export and save searches is available at all stages. Penny Crossland, Editor, VIP Magazine  The more I get into the database, the happier I am that we’ll have it–REALLY happy!!!  Between the quality and affordability of your product, its appeal to and value for our users, and the inestimably ethical and loyalty-guaranteeing conduct of your business, I will always have more than sufficient praises to sing for Plunkett Research. Michael Oppenheim, Collections & Reference Services, UCLA  Plunkett Research Online provides a great ‘one stop shop’ for us to quickly come up to speed on major industries. It provides us with an overall analysis of the market, key statistics, and overviews of the major players in the industry in an online service that is fast, easy to navigate, and reliable. Wendy Stotts, Manager, Carlson Companies-Information Center  We are especially trying to push Plunkett’s since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use. Gary White, Business Materials Selector, Penn State University     Sign up for Free Research Reports   Subscribe                                 
